Idaho, session 2025, H0113.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 5-347, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section 1,
Chapter 256, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
5-347 5-348. IMMUNITY OF VOLUNTEER SECURITY PERSONNEL -- RELIGIOUS
ORGANIZATIONS. (1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Person" means an individual.
(b) "Religious organization" means a body or community of persons
united as individuals or as an entity, under one (1) form of government,
by profession of the same faith and the observance of the same rituals or
ceremonies as members or attendees of a bona fide church, synagogue, or
house of worship.
(c) "Security personnel" means persons who provide safety, security,
or protection for a religious organization as authorized by the reli-
gious organization to benefit persons in attendance at a meeting or
other gathering held at, or sponsored by, the religious organization.
(d) "Volunteer" means a person who provides services without any ex-
press or implied promise of remuneration.
(2) No action shall lie or be maintained for civil damages in any court
of this state against any volunteer security personnel of a religious organ-
ization for providing safety, security, or protection services for the re-
ligious organization or against the religious organization for which such
volunteer security personnel provided safety, security, or protection ser-
vices.
(a) The immunity provided by this section shall apply to and include
safety, security, or protection provided by use of nonlethal or lethal
force.
(b) The immunity provided by this section shall not apply to or include
acts or omissions that arise out of unreasonable, reckless, grossly
negligent, or wanton actions or conduct.
SECTION 2. That Section 14-5-201, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
14-5-201. WHEN PROPERTY PRESUMED ABANDONED. (1) Subject to the provi-
sions of section 14-5-210 14-5-209, Idaho Code, the following property is
presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner during the speci-
fied period:
(a) A traveler's check, fifteen (15) years after issuance;
(b) A money order, seven (7) years after issuance;
(c) A corporate bond, bearer bond, or original issue discount bond,
five (5) years after the earliest of the date the bond matures or is
called or the obligation to pay the principal of the bond arises;
(d) A demand savings or time deposit, including a deposit that is auto-
matically renewable, five (5) years after the later of the date of matu-


rity, if applicable, or the date of the last indication of interest in
the property by the apparent owner. However, a deposit that is automat-
ically renewable is deemed matured on its initial date of maturity plus
one (1) annual renewal;
(e) Money or a credit owed to a customer as a result of a retail business
transaction, other than in-store credit for returned merchandise, five
(5) years after the obligation arose;
(f) An amount owed by an insurance company on a life or endowment insur-
ance policy or an annuity contract that has matured or terminated, five
(5) years after the obligation to pay arose under the terms of the pol-
icy or contract or, if a policy or contract for which an amount is owed on
proof of death has not matured by proof of the death of the insured or an-
nuitant, as follows:
(i) With respect to an amount owed on a life or endowment insur-
ance policy, five (5) years after the earlier of the date:
1. The insurance company has knowledge of the death of the
insured; or
2. The insured has attained, or would have attained if liv-
ing, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the
reserve for the policy is based; and
(ii) With respect to an amount owed on an annuity contract, five
(5) years after the date the insurance company has knowledge of the
death of the annuitant;
(g) Property distributable by a business association in the course of
dissolution, one (1) year after the property becomes distributable;
(h) Property held by a court, including property received as pro-
ceeds of a class action, one (1) year after the property becomes dis-
tributable;
(i) Property held by a government or governmental subdivision, agency,
or instrumentality, including municipal bond interest and unredeemed
principal under the administration of a paying agent or indenture
trustee, one (1) year after the property becomes distributable;
(j) Wages, commissions, bonuses, or reimbursements to which an em-
ployee is entitled or other compensation for personal services, other
than a payroll card converted balance as defined in section 14-5-102,
Idaho Code, one (1) year after the amount becomes payable;
(k) A deposit or refund owed to a subscriber by a utility, one (1) year
after the deposit or refund becomes payable;
(l) Funds on deposit or held in trust for the prepayment of a funeral or
other funeral-related expenses other than burial rights, the earliest
of:
(i) Two (2) years after the date of death of the beneficiary;
(ii) One (1) year after the date the beneficiary has attained, or
would have attained if living, the age of one hundred five (105)
years where the holder does not know whether the beneficiary is de-
ceased; or
(iii) Thirty (30) years after the contract for prepayment was exe-
cuted.
(m) Funds from the termination of a defined contribution or other re-
tirement plan where the apparent owner is a missing participant and the


plan fiduciary is unable to or elects not to distribute missing partic-
ipant benefits into an individual retirement account, as soon as admin-
istratively feasible after the date of plan termination; and
(n) Property not specified in this section or sections 14-5-202 through
14-5-208, Idaho Code, the earlier of five (5) years after the owner
first has a right to demand the property or the obligation to pay or dis-
tribute the property arises.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section,
and subject to the provisions of section 14-5-209, Idaho Code:
(a) If the holder has imposed a charge against property for reason of
inactivity or the failure of the owner to claim the property within a
specified period of time, and the abandonment period for the property
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is greater than five (5)
years, the property shall instead be presumed abandoned five (5) years
from the owner's last indication of interest in the property; and
(b) A deceased owner cannot indicate interest in the owner's property.
If the owner is deceased, and the abandonment period for the owner's
property as specified in subsection (1) of this section is greater than
two (2) years, the property shall instead be presumed abandoned two (2)
years from the date of the owner's last indication of interest in the
property.
SECTION 3. That Section 14-5-202, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
14-5-202. WHEN TAX-DEFERRED RETIREMENT ACCOUNT PRESUMED ABAN-
DONED. (1) Subject to the provisions of section 14-5-210 14-5-209, Idaho
Code, property held in a pension account or retirement account that qual-
ifies for tax deferral under the income tax laws of the United States is
presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent owner three (3) years
after the later of:
(a) The following dates:
(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
the date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by
first class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to
the holder undelivered by the United States postal service; or
(ii) If the second communication is sent later than thirty (30)
days after the date the first communication is returned undeliv-
ered, the date the first communication was returned undelivered by
the United States postal service; or
(b) The earlier of the following dates:
(i) The date specified in the income tax laws of the United States
by which distribution of the property must begin in order to avoid
a tax penalty, if reasonably determinable by the holder; or
(ii) One (1) year after the date of mandatory distribution follow-
ing death if the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, 26 U.S.C. 1, et
seq., requires distribution to avoid a tax penalty and the holder:
1. Receives confirmation of the death of the apparent owner
in the ordinary course of its business; or
2. Confirms the death of the apparent owner under subsection
(2) of this section.


(2) If a holder in the ordinary course of its business receives notice
or an indication of the death of an apparent owner and subsection (1)(b) of
this section applies, the holder shall attempt no later than ninety (90) days
after receipt of the notice or indication to confirm whether the apparent
owner is deceased.
(3) If the holder does not send communications to the apparent owner of
an account described in subsection (1) of this section by first class United
States mail, the holder shall attempt to confirm the apparent owner's inter-
est in the property by sending the apparent owner an electronic mail communi-
cation no later than two (2) years after the apparent owner's last indication
of interest in the property. However, the holder shall promptly attempt to
contact the apparent owner by first class United States mail if:
(a) The holder does not have information needed to send the apparent
owner an electronic mail communication or the holder believes that the
apparent owner's electronic mail address in the holder's records is not
valid;
(b) The holder receives notification that the electronic mail communi-
cation was not received; or
(c) The apparent owner does not respond to the electronic mail communi-
cation no later than thirty (30) days after the communication was sent.
(4) If first class United States mail sent under subsection (3) of this
section is returned to the holder undelivered by the United States postal
service, the property is presumed abandoned three (3) years after the later
of:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the date a
second consecutive communication to contact the apparent owner sent by
first class United States mail is returned to the holder undelivered;
(b) If the second communication is sent later than thirty (30) days af-
ter the date the first communication is returned undelivered, the date
the first communication was returned undelivered; or
(c) The date established by subsection (1)(b) of this section.
SECTION 4. That Section 14-5-203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
14-5-203. WHEN OTHER TAX-DEFERRED ACCOUNT PRESUMED ABANDONED. Sub-
ject to the provisions of section 14-5-210 14-5-209, Idaho Code, and except
for property described in section 14-5-202, Idaho Code, unclaimed accounts
in the Idaho college savings program subject to the provisions of section
33-5410, Idaho Code, and property held in a plan or account described in
section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, including a health
savings account, that qualifies for tax deferral under the income tax laws
of the United States is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed by the apparent
owner three (3) years after the earlier of:
(1) The date, if reasonably determinable by the holder, specified in
the income tax laws and regulations of the United States by which distribu-
tion of the property must begin to avoid a tax penalty, with no distribution
having been made;
(2) The date the holder confirms or receives confirmation of the death
of the apparent owner in the ordinary course of its business; or
(3) Thirty (30) years after the date the account was opened.


SECTION 5. That Section 14-5-204, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
14-5-204. WHEN CUSTODIAL ACCOUNT FOR MINOR PRESUMED ABANDONED. (1)
Subject to the provisions of section 14-5-210 14-5-209, Idaho Code, property
held in an account established under a state's uniform gifts to minors act
or uniform transfers to minors act is presumed abandoned if it is unclaimed
by or on behalf of the minor on whose behalf the account was opened five (5)
years after the later of:
(a) The date a communication sent by the holder by first class United
States mail to the custodian of the minor on whose behalf the account was
opened is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal
service; or
(b) The date on which the custodian is required to transfer the property
to the minor or the minor's estate in accordance with the uniform gifts
to minors act or uniform transfers to minors act of the state in which
the account was opened.
(2) If the holder does not send communications to the custodian of the
minor on whose behalf an account described in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion was opened by first class United States mail, the holder shall attempt
to confirm the custodian's interest in the property by sending the custodian
an electronic mail communication no later than two (2) years after the cus-
todian's last indication of interest in the property. However, the holder
shall promptly attempt to contact the custodian by first class United States
mail if:
(a) The holder does not have information needed to send the custodian
an electronic mail communication or the holder believes that the custo-
dian's electronic mail address in the holder's records is not valid;
(b) The holder receives notification that the electronic mail communi-
cation was not received; or
(c) The custodian does not respond to the electronic mail communication
within thirty (30) days after the communication was sent.
(3) If first class United States mail sent pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States
postal service, the property is presumed abandoned five (5) years after the
date established by subsection (1)(b) of this section.
(4) When the property in the account described in subsection (1) of this
section is transferred to the minor on whose behalf an account was opened or
to the minor's estate, the property in the account is no longer subject to
this section.
SECTION 6. That Section 14-5-206, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
14-5-206. WHEN STORED VALUE CARD PRESUMED ABANDONED. (1) Subject to
the provisions of section 14-5-210 14-5-209, Idaho Code, the net card value
of a stored value card, other than a payroll card that has not been duly con-
verted to a federal deposit insurance corporation-insured, owner accessible
account balance at a financial institution, is presumed abandoned five (5)
years after the latest of:


(a) December 31 of the year in which the card is issued or additional
funds are deposited into it;
(b) The most recent indication of interest in the card by the apparent
owner; or
(c) A verification or review of the balance by or on behalf of the appar-
ent owner.
(2) The amount presumed abandoned in a stored value card is the net card
value at the time it is presumed abandoned.
SECTION 7. That Section 14-5-207, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
14-5-207. WHEN SECURITY PRESUMED ABANDONED. (1) Subject to the provi-
sions of section 14-5-210 14-5-209, Idaho Code, a security is presumed aban-
doned five (5) years after:
(a) The date a second consecutive communication sent by the holder by
first class United States mail to the apparent owner is returned to the
holder undelivered by the United States postal service; or
(b) If the second communication is made later than thirty (30) days af-
ter the first communication is returned, the date the first communica-
tion is returned undelivered to the holder by the United States postal
service.
(2) If the holder does not send communications to the apparent owner
of a security by first class United States mail, the holder shall attempt to
confirm the apparent owner's interest in the security by sending the appar-
ent owner an electronic mail communication. However, the holder promptly
shall attempt to contact the apparent owner by first class United States mail
if:
(a) The holder does not have information needed to send the apparent
owner an electronic mail communication or the holder believes that the
apparent owner's electronic mail address in the holder's records is not
valid;
(b) The holder receives notification that the electronic mail communi-
cation was not received; or
(c) The apparent owner does not respond to the electronic mail communi-
cation within thirty (30) days after the communication was sent.
(3) If first class United States mail sent is returned to the holder
undelivered by the United States postal service, the security is presumed
abandoned five (5) years after the date the mail is returned.
SECTION 8. That Section 16-1648, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section 1,
Chapter 64, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
16-1648 16-1649. NOTIFICATION OF RIGHTS. (1) When the department, in
accordance with this chapter, commences an investigation after having re-
ceived information that a child may be abused, neglected, or abandoned and in
the course of such investigation contacts, directly and in person, the par-
ents, guardians, or any persons having legal custody of the child, then the
department shall notify such parents, guardians, or persons that they have
the right to:


(a) Refuse to answer questions;
(b) Obtain an attorney at their own expense, consult with such attor-
ney, and have such attorney present during an investigation; provided,
however, that the department is not authorized to appoint or obtain an
attorney for such parents, guardians, or persons;
(c) Refuse entry to their home or other real property; and
(d) Refuse the questioning of any minor children in their home or on
their property, unless there is an order issued by a court of competent
jurisdiction authorizing a particular entry or particular questioning
or examination.
(2) The notification required by subsection (1) of this section shall
be made in writing at the time of or within seventy-two (72) hours after the
department makes the first contact directly and in person with the parents,
guardians, or other persons having legal custody of the child.
(3) A parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody of the
child may expressly assert the rights provided in this section.
(4) The notification required by subsection (1) of this section shall
be made in writing on a form prescribed by the department. Such notification
shall state that if the safety of the child cannot be determined, the depart-
ment may request assistance from a law enforcement agency or seek a court or-
der.
(5) Failure by the department to provide the notification required by
this section in a specific investigation shall not affect the department's
ability to conduct such investigation or to carry out the department's du-
ties as provided in this chapter.
SECTION 9. That Section 18-1511, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-1511. SALE OR BARTER OF CHILD FOR ADOPTION OR OTHER PURPOSE PENAL-
IZED -- ALLOWED EXPENSES. (1) Any person or persons who shall sell or barter
any child for adoption or for any other purpose shall be guilty of a felony,
and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment in the state peniten-
tiary for no more than fourteen (14) years, or by a fine of no more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both such fine and imprisonment.
(2) Any person or organization without a valid and unrevoked license to
place children for adoption issued by the Idaho department of health and wel-
fare or a valid and unrevoked license to practice law in Idaho shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor if such person or organization:
(a) Advertises in any periodical or newspaper, by radio, or by any other
public medium that the person or organization will place children for
adoption;
(b) Accepts, supplies, provides, or obtains children for adoption; or
(c) Causes any advertisement to be published in or by any public medium
soliciting, requesting, or asking for any child or children for adop-
tion.
(3) Any person, organization, association, or corporation without a
valid and unrevoked license to place children for adoption issued by the
Idaho department of health and welfare that places any child for adoption
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. The provisions of this subsection shall
not apply to a birth parent.


(4) The provisions of this section shall not prohibit any person or
adoption agency from providing, in addition to legal and medical costs, rea-
sonable maternity and living expenses during the pregnancy and for a period
not to exceed six (6) weeks postpartum based on demonstrated financial need.
(2)
(5) Any person or agency seeking to provide financial assistance in
excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall do so after informally sub-
mitting to a court of competent jurisdiction a verified financial plan
outlining proposed expenditures. The court may approve or amend such a pro-
posal and shall not be required to make any findings prior to an approval.
The court shall take into consideration all of the needs of the birth mother
from the time of conception of the child, including housing, medical, basic
living, transportation, and any increases to cost of living. A prospective
adoptive parent, or another person acting on behalf of a prospective adop-
tive parent, shall make payments for allowed expenses only to third-party
vendors, as is reasonably practical. All actual expenditures shall be pre-
sented by verified affidavit at the time of the adoption finalization. (3)
(6) The financial assistance contemplated by this section shall be con-
sidered a charitable gift, not subject to recovery under the terms of section
16-1515, Idaho Code. (4)
SECTION 10. That Section 18-8603, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8603. PENALTIES. (1) A person who commits human sex trafficking as
described in section 18-8607, Idaho Code, shall by be guilty of a felony pun-
ishable by imprisonment for a period of no less than five (5) years and no
more than twenty-five (25) years, or by a fine of no less than fifteen thou-
sand dollars ($15,000) and no more than eighty thousand dollars ($80,000),
or by both such fine and imprisonment.
(2) A person who commits human sex trafficking of a child as described
in section 18-8608, Idaho Code, shall by be guilty of a felony punishable
by imprisonment for a period of no less than ten (10) years and no more than
thirty (30) years, or by a fine of no less than twenty thousand dollars
($20,000) and no more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or by
both such fine and imprisonment.
(3) A person who commits human labor trafficking as described in sec-
tion 18-8609, Idaho Code, shall by be guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment for a period of no less than three (3) years and no more than
twenty-five (25) years, or by a fine of no less than ten thousand dollars
($10,000) and no more than eighty thousand dollars ($80,000), or by both such
fine and imprisonment.
(4) A person who commits human labor trafficking of a child as described
in section 18-8610, Idaho Code, shall by be guilty of a felony punishable
by imprisonment for a period of no less than five (5) years and no more than
twenty-five (25) years, or by a fine of no less than fifteen thousand dollars
($15,000) and no more than eighty thousand dollars ($80,000), or by both such
fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 11. That Section 18-8608, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


18-8608. HUMAN SEX TRAFFICKING OF A CHILD. A person who is eighteen
(18) years of age or older commits the felony of human sex trafficking of a
child if the person:
(1) Traffics a child and knowingly, by any means, causes or attempts to
cause the trafficked person to engage in or become the victim of:
(a) Commercial sexual activity;
(b) A sexually explicit performance; or
(c) Conduct prohibited by:
(i) Section 18-924 (sexual battery);
(ii) Section 18-925 (aggravated sexual battery);
(iii) Section 18-1601 18-6101 (rape);
(iv) Section 18-1506 (sexual abuse of a child under sixteen
years);
(v) Section 18-1507 (sexual exploitation of a child);
(vi) Section 18-1507A (sexual exploitation of a child by elec-
tronic means);
(vii) Section 18-1508 (lewd conduct with a minor child under six-
teen);
(viii) Section 18-1508A (sexual battery of a minor child sixteen
or seventeen years of age);
(ix) Section 18-5602 (procurement);
(x) Section 18-5603 (receiving pay for procurement);
(xi) Section 18-5604 (paying for procurement);
(xii) Section 18-5605 (detention for commercial sexual activity);
(xiii) Section 18-5606 (receiving proceeds of illegal sexual ac-
tivity);
(xiv) Section 18-5608 (place of commercial sexual activity);
(xv) Section 18-5609 (inducing a child into commercial sexual ac-
tivity);
(xvi) Section 18-5610 (utilizing a child for commercial sexual ac-
tivity);
(xvii) Section 18-5611 (inducing a child to engage in commercial
sexual activity);
(xviii) Section 18-5613 (providing commercial sexual activity);
(xix) Section 18-5614 (soliciting commercial sexual activity);
(xx) Section 18-6601 (incest);
(xxi) Section 18-6602 (sexual abuse of an animal);
(xxii) Section 18-6603 (sexual abuse of human remains); or
(xxiii) Section 18-6604 (forcible penetration by use of a foreign
object);
(2) Engages in sexual contact with a child being trafficked in the man-
ner described in subsection (1) of this section; or
(3) Receives any benefit from participating in a venture knowing that
the venture involves an activity described in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 12. That Section 19-6005, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-6005. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER. Consistent
with the state of Idaho's obligation to provide indigent public defense pur-


suant to the sixth amendment to the United States constitution; section 13,
article I of the constitution of the state of Idaho; and this chapter, the
state public defender shall have the power to:
(1) Ensure that qualified defending attorneys, experts, investiga-
tors, mitigation specialists, stenographers, paralegals, or other support
staff and assistants are employed or contracted as necessary to carry out the
purposes of this chapter, that the same deliver indigent defense services in
compliance with applicable indigent defense standards, and that any persons
hired or contracted to provided indigent individuals charged with an offense
or offenses punishable by a sentence of death be qualified to provide team
representation. Provided, however, the terms of any contract with a defend-
ing attorney shall not include any pricing structure that charges or pays a
single fixed fee for the services of the defending attorney and client-re-
lated expenses;
(2) Provide appropriate facilities, including office space, furni-
ture, equipment, books and other legal research tools, postage, supplies,
and secure information and communication technology equipment that is rea-
sonably necessary for the proper performance of the state public defender;
(3) Implement procedures for the oversight, implementation, enforce-
ment, and improvement of indigent defense standards so that the right to
counsel of indigent persons is constitutionally delivered to all indigent
persons in this state;
(4) Implement the most current American bar association standards for
defending attorneys delivering indigent defense pursuant to this chapter,
including caseload standards;
(5) Provide training and continuing legal education approved by the
Idaho state bar for defending attorneys and employees that promotes compe-
tency and consistency in case types defended by the state public defender;
(6) Require defending attorneys, contractors, and employees to keep
appropriate records, consistent with uniform data-reporting requirements,
respecting each person to whom the state public defender is responsible for
providing defense, including but not limited to caseload, workload, and ex-
penditures;
(7) Establish uniform contracts both for contract defending attorneys,
where utilized throughout the state or when caseload volumes require their
use, and for conflict defending attorneys, when carrying out the purposes
of this chapter. Contract pay rates shall be informed by the prevailing
statewide market rate;
(8) Establish a uniform system for contracting with qualified attor-
neys to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including a system for appli-
cation, payment for services, and reimbursement; and
(9) Collaborate with district public defenders on the policies of
the office and in the formation of a budget request sufficient to meet the
state's constitutional obligation to provide indigent services, which the
state public defender shall submit to the division of financial management
as required by law.; and
(10) Seek reimbursement from any applicable federal funds at the de-
partment of health and welfare for any allowable costs of representation
or administrative costs for any representation authorized by this chapter,


whether provided by employees of the office of the state public defender or
by contract.
SECTION 13. That Section 19-6009, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
19-6009. RIGHT TO COUNSEL OF INDIGENT PERSON -- REPRESENTATION AT ALL
STAGES OF CRIMINAL AND COMMITMENT PROCEEDINGS -- PAYMENT. (1) An indigent
person who is being detained by a law enforcement officer, who is confined
or is the subject of hospitalization proceedings pursuant to section 18-212,
66-322, 66-326, 66-329, 66-404 or 66-406, Idaho Code, or who is under formal
charge of having committed, or is being detained under a conviction of, a se-
rious crime is entitled:
(a) To be represented by an attorney to the same extent as a person hav-
ing his own counsel is so entitled; and
(b) To be provided with the necessary services and facilities of repre-
sentation, including investigation and other preparation. The attor-
ney, services and facilities, and the court costs shall be provided at
public expense to the extent that the person is, at the time the court
determines indigency pursuant to section 19-6011, Idaho Code, unable to
provide for their payment.
(2) An indigent person who is entitled to be represented by an attorney
under subsection (1) of this section is entitled:
(a) To be counseled and defended at all stages of the matter beginning
with the earliest time when a person providing his own counsel would be
entitled to be represented by an attorney and including revocation of
probation;
(b) To be represented in any appeal; and
(c) To be represented in any other post-conviction or post-commitment
proceeding that the attorney or the indigent person considers appro-
priate, unless the court in which the proceeding is brought determines
that it is not a proceeding that a reasonable person with adequate means
would be willing to bring at his own expense and is therefore a frivolous
proceeding.
(3) Upon a finding of indigency, representation by an attorney under
subsection (1) of this section shall include the following cases, excluding
those cases where the state appellate public defender has jurisdiction pur-
suant to section 19-5905, Idaho Code, and excluding those cases of guardian
ad litem representation pursuant to section 16-1614(4), Idaho Code:
(a) Felony and misdemeanor cases;
(b) Actions arising under the Idaho juvenile corrections act, chapter
5, title 20, Idaho Code;
(c) Proceedings under the uniform post-conviction procedure act, chap-
ter 49, title 19, Idaho Code;
(d) Civil contempt proceedings where incarceration is sought;
(e) Actions arising under the child protective act, chapter 16, title
16, Idaho Code; and
(f) Appeals from adjudicatory decrees or orders under section 16-1625,
Idaho Code.


(4) An indigent person's right to a benefit under subsection (1) or (2)
of this section is unaffected by his having provided a similar benefit at his
own expense, or by his having waived it, at an earlier stage.
SECTION 14. That Section 22-3404, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-3404. PESTICIDE AND CHEMIGATION APPLICATORS -- CLASSIFICATION LI-
CENSING REQUIREMENTS. (1) The director may classify pesticide applicator
licenses issued under this act. Such classifications may include but are not
limited to professional applicators, private applicators, and chemigation
applicators. Separate licensing requirements and testing procedures may be
utilized for each classification.
(2) Chemigation Applicators. Any user of a chemigation system must be
at least eighteen (18) years of age and shall be certified for competency by
the department.
(a) On the application to perform chemigation, the applicant must cer-
tify that the equipment and system he plans to use for chemigation meet
department standards and provide other relevant information.
(b) Financial requirements and fees for chemigation certification
shall be commensurate with state requirements for professional and pri-
vate applicators.
(3) Professional Applicators. No person shall act as a professional
applicator without first obtaining a professional applicator's license is-
sued by the department.
(a) Application for a license shall be on a form prescribed by the de-
partment and shall be accompanied by a fee as prescribed by rule;
(b) An applicant must be at least eighteen (18) years of age and must
pass the department's examination in order to demonstrate his knowledge
of how to apply, use and handle pesticides or chemicals in areas rele-
vant to the operations he intends to undertake, or proper equipment and
methods for injecting chemicals through irrigation systems;
(c) Show proof of financial responsibility as prescribed by rule;
(d) An examination fee will be charged as prescribed by rule and an ad-
ditional examination fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be charged when
an exam is requested at other than a regularly scheduled examination
date; and
(e) If at any time a licensed professional applicator fails to maintain
the financial responsibility required by paragraph (c) of this subsec-
tion, his license shall be automatically suspended until the depart-
ment receives verification that he is in compliance with paragraph (c)
of this subsection.
(4) Private Applicator. No person shall act as a private applicator
without first obtaining a private applicator license issued by the depart-
ment.
(a) Application for a license shall be on a form prescribed by the de-
partment;
(b) An applicant must be at least eighteen (18) years of age and must
pass the department's examination in order to demonstrate his knowledge
of how to apply, use and handle pesticides or chemicals in areas rele-


vant to the operations he intends to undertake or proper equipment and
methods for injecting chemicals through irrigation systems; and
(c) An applicant must pay a license fee as prescribed by rule.
(5) If the director finds an applicant qualified for a professional,
private, or chemigation applicator's license, and if an applicant applying
for a license to engage in the application of pesticides or chemicals has met
all of the requirements of any applicable federal or state laws, regulations
and rules, the director shall issue the license. The license or permit may
restrict the applicant to the use of a certain type or types of equipment,
pesticides or chemicals. If a license or permit is not issued as applied for,
the department shall inform the applicant in writing of the reasons there-
for.
(6) The director may by rule require professional applicators to main-
tain and furnish records forthwith pertaining to the application of pesti-
cides and other relevant information as he may deem necessary.
(7) Licenses issued to dealers and professional, private, and chemiga-
tion applicators shall expire as designated by the director unless suspended
or revoked as provided for in section 22-3409, Idaho Code.
(8) Exemptions:
(a) The following persons are exempt from subsections (3), (4), and (5)
of this section:
(i) Any person applying pesticides other than restricted-use
pesticides for himself or on an exchange of service basis, and who
does not publicly hold himself out as a professional applicator;
(ii) Any person using hand-powered equipment to apply pesticides
other than restricted-use pesticides to lawns, or to ornamental
trees and shrubs and who employs two (2) or fewer persons in his
business who apply pesticides and is not holding himself out as a
professional applicator;
(iii) Any industry, governmental, university of Idaho research
personnel and extension research personnel who apply pesticides
other than restricted-use pesticides to experimental plots or to
demonstrate the use of pesticides; and
(iv) Any veterinarian who applies pesticides as an integral part
of his business and does not publicly hold himself out as a profes-
sional applicator.
(b) Federal, state, and other governmental agencies are exempt from the
licensing fees provision of subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(c) Professional applicators who do not apply pesticides may receive an
exemption from the proof of financial responsibility required in sub-
section (3)(d) (3)(c) of this section, upon submitting a completed form
prescribed by the department.
SECTION 15. That Section 30-29-863, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
30-29-863. SHAREHOLDERS' ACTION. (a) Shareholders' action respecting
a director's conflicting interest transaction is effective for purposes of
section 30-29-861(b)(2), Idaho Code, if a majority of the votes cast by the
holders of all qualified shares are in favor of the transaction after:


(1) Notice to shareholders describing action to be taken respecting the
transaction;
(2) Provision to the corporation of the information referred to in sub-
section (b) of this section; and
(3) Communication to the shareholders entitled to vote on the transac-
tion of the information that is the subject of required disclosure, to
the extent the information is not known by them. In the case of share-
holders' action at a meeting, the shareholders entitled to vote shall be
determined as of the record date for notice of the meeting.
(b) A director who has a conflicting interest respecting the transac-
tion shall, before the shareholders' vote, inform the secretary, or other
officer or agent of the corporation authorized to tabulate votes, in writ-
ing, of the number of shares that the director knows are not qualified shares
under subsection (c) of this section, and the identity of the holders of
those shares.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Holder" means and "held by" refers to shares held by a record
shareholder, a beneficial shareholder, and an unrestricted voting
trust beneficial owner; and
(2) "Qualified shares" means all shares entitled to be voted with re-
spect to the transaction except for shares that the secretary or other
officer or agent of the corporation authorized to tabulate votes either
knows, or under subsection (b) of this section is notified, are held by
either a director who has a conflicting interest respecting the trans-
action or a related person of the director, not including a person de-
scribed in section 30-29-860(4)(f) 30-29-860(5)(f), Idaho Code.
(d) A majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the holders of all
qualified shares constitutes a quorum for purposes of compliance with this
section. Subject to the provisions of subsection (e) of this section, share-
holders' action that otherwise complies with this section is not affected
by the presence of holders or by the voting of shares that are not qualified
shares.
(e) If a shareholders' vote does not comply with subsection (a) of this
section solely because of a director's failure to comply with subsection (b)
of this section, and if the director establishes that the failure was not in-
tended to influence, and did not in fact determine, the outcome of the vote,
the court may take such action respecting the transaction and the director,
and may give such effect, if any, to the shareholders' vote, as the court con-
siders appropriate in the circumstances.
(f) Where shareholders' action under this section does not satisfy a
quorum or voting requirement applicable to the authorization of the trans-
action by reason of the articles of incorporation or the bylaws or a provi-
sion of law, independent action to satisfy those authorization requirements
shall be taken by the shareholders, in which action shares that are not qual-
ified shares may participate.
SECTION 16. That Section 33-1004E, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:


33-1004E. DISTRICT'S SALARY-BASED APPORTIONMENT. Each district shall
be entitled to a salary-based apportionment calculated as provided in this
section.
(1) To determine the apportionment for instructional staff, take
the amounts indicated on the career ladder table plus the amounts associ-
ated with the additional education allocation amounts pursuant to section
33-1004B, Idaho Code, and calculate the weighted average. The amount so
determined shall be multiplied by the district staff allowance for instruc-
tional staff determined as provided in section 33-1004(2), Idaho Code.
Full-time instructional staff salaries shall be determined from a salary
schedule developed by each district and submitted to the state department of
education. No full-time instructional staff member or pupil service staff
member on the residency compensation rung shall be paid less than the minimum
dollar amount on the career ladder residency compensation rung pursuant to
section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, for the applicable fiscal year.
(2) Effective July 1, 2022, no full-time instructional staff member
or pupil service staff member on the professional or advanced professional
compensation rung shall be paid less than the minimum dollar amount on the
career ladder professional compensation rung pursuant to section 33-1004B,
Idaho Code, for the applicable fiscal year.
(3) Effective July 1, 2025, no full-time instructional staff member or
pupil service staff member on the advanced professional compensation rung
shall be paid less than the minimum dollar amount on the advanced profes-
sional compensation rung pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, for the
applicable fiscal year.
(4) If an instructional staff member has been certified by the national
board for professional teaching standards, the staff member shall receive
two thousand dollars ($2,000) per year for five (5) years from the year in
which national board certification was earned. The district staff allot-
ment shall be increased by two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each national
board-certified instructional staff member who earned national board cer-
tification; provided however, that no such awards shall be paid for the pe-
riod July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, nor shall any liabilities accrue
or payments be made pursuant to this section in the future to any individu-
als who would have otherwise qualified for a payment during this stated time
period. The resulting amount is the district's salary-based apportionment
for instructional staff. For purposes of this section, teachers qualifying
for the salary increase shall be those who have been recognized as national
board-certified teachers as of July 1 of each year.
(5) To determine the apportionment for pupil service staff, take
the amounts indicated on the career ladder table plus the amounts associ-
ated with the additional education allocation amounts pursuant to section
33-1004B, Idaho Code, and calculate the weighted average. If the district
does not employ any pupil service staff, the district's pupil service staff
average salary shall equal the district's instructional staff average
salary for purposes of calculating pupil service salary-based apportion-
ment. The amount so determined shall be multiplied by the district staff al-
lowance for pupil service staff determined pursuant to section 33-1004(3),
Idaho Code. Full-time pupil service staff salaries shall be determined from
a salary schedule developed by each district and submitted to the state de-


partment of education. The resulting amount is the district's salary-based
apportionment for pupil service staff. No full-time pupil service staff
member shall be paid less than the minimum dollar amount on the career ladder
residency compensation rung pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, for
the applicable fiscal year.
(6) To determine the apportionment for district administrative staff,
first determine the district average experience and education index by plac-
ing all eligible certificated administrative employees on the statewide
index provided in section 33-1004A, Idaho Code. The resulting average is the
district index. If the district does not employ any administrative staff,
the district administrative index shall equal the statewide average index
for purposes of calculating administrative salary-based apportionment. On
and after July 1, 2024, the district administrative staff index shall be
multiplied by the base salary of forty-four thousand four hundred forty-six
dollars ($44,446). The amount so determined shall be multiplied by the
district staff allowance for administrative staff determined as provided
in section 33-1004(4), Idaho Code. The resulting amount is the district's
salary-based apportionment for administrative staff. forty-three thousand
five hundred eighty-three dollars ($43,583)
(7) On and after July 1, 2024, to determine the apportionment for clas-
sified staff, multiply thirty-nine thousand nine hundred sixty-six dollars
($39,966) by the district classified staff allowance determined as pro-
vided in section 33-1004(5), Idaho Code. The amount so determined is the
district's apportionment for classified staff. thirty-nine thousand one
hundred ninety dollars ($39,190)
(8) The district's salary-based apportionment shall be the sum of the
apportionments calculated in subsections (1), (4), (5), (6) and (7) of this
section, plus the benefit apportionment as provided in section 33-1004F,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 17. That Section 41-5602, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
41-5602. PROMPT PAYMENT OF CLAIMS. (1) Except as otherwise specifi-
cally provided in this chapter, an insurer shall process a claim for payment
for health care services rendered by a practitioner or facility to a benefi-
ciary in accordance with this section.
(2) If a beneficiary, practitioner or facility submits an electronic
claim to an insurer within thirty (30) days of the date on which service was
delivered, an insurer shall pay or deny the claim not later than thirty (30)
days after receipt of the claim.
(3) If a beneficiary, practitioner or facility submits a paper claim
for payment to an insurer within forty-five (45) days of the date on which
service was delivered, an insurer shall pay or deny the claim not later than
forty-five (45) days after receipt of the claim.
(4) If an insurer denies the claim or needs additional information to
process the claim, the insurer shall notify the practitioner or facility and
the beneficiary in writing within thirty (30) days of receipt of an elec-
tronic claim or within forty-five (45) days of receipt of a paper claim. The
notice shall state why the insurer denied the claim.


(5) If the claim was denied because more information was required to
process the claim, the notice shall specifically describe all information
and supporting documentation needed to evaluate the claim for processing.
If the practitioner or facility submits the information and documentation
identified by the insurer within thirty (30) days of receipt of the written
notice, the insurer shall process and pay the claim within thirty (30) days
of receipt of the additional information or, if appropriate, deny the claim.
(6) Any claim submitted pursuant to this chapter shall use the cur-
rent procedural terminology (CPT) code in effect, as published by the
American medical association, the international classification of disease
diseases(ICD) code in effect, as published by the United States department
of health and human services, or the healthcare common procedural coding
system (HCPCS) code in effect, as published by the United States centers for
medicaid and medicare medicare and medicaid services (CMS).
(7) This chapter shall not apply to claims submitted under policies or
certificates of insurance for specific disease, hospital confinement indem-
nity, accident-only, credit, medicare supplement, disability income insur-
ance, student health benefits only coverage issued as a supplement to li-
ability insurance, worker's compensation or similar insurance, automobile
medical payment insurance or nonrenewable short-term coverage issued for a
period of twelve (12) months or less.
SECTION 18. That Section 42-233c, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
42-233c. EASTERN SNAKE PLAIN AQUIFER AREA HAVING COMMON GROUND WATER
SUPPLY. (1) The area having a common ground water supply for the eastern
Snake plain aquifer, as that term is used in the administration of water
rights pursuant to the rules for the conjunctive management of surface and
ground water resources, is the aquifer underlying the eastern Snake river
plain as described in model calibration report, eastern Snake plain aquifer
model version 2.2. of May 2021.
(2) The director of the department of water resources may expand the
area having a common ground water supply for the eastern Snake plain aquifer
to include tributary basins that affect the eastern Snake river plain
aquifer. The director shall not expand the area having a common ground water
supply for the eastern Snake plain aquifer to include areas that have been
designated as a critical ground water area or a ground water management area
and that have approved ground water management plans unless the director
determines that the existing ground water management plan for such tributary
basin is insufficient to manage the effects of ground water withdrawals on
the aquifer from which withdrawals are made and on any other hydraulically
connected sources of water, including the eastern Snake plain aquifer.
(3) Before entering an order expanding the eastern Snake plain aquifer
area of common ground water supply pursuant to subsection (2) of this sec-
tion, the director shall, by regular mail, send notice of the proposed action
to the owner of each water right proposed to be administered in the tribu-
tary basin. The notice shall describe the proposed action to be taken, the
reasons therefore therefor, and the time and place of a hearing to be held
concerning the proposed action, and shall provide a time period within which
written comment on the action will be accepted. The hearing shall not be


held sooner than ten (10) days after the mailing of the notice, and the writ-
ten comment period shall not close sooner than ten (10) days after the hear-
ing. Instead of mailing notice, the director may publish notice describ-
ing the proposed action, the time and place for the hearing, and the deadline
for receiving written comment. The notice shall be published once a week for
two (2) weeks in a newspaper having general circulation within the tributary
basin, with the second publication appearing at least ten (10) days before
the date set for the hearing. The hearing shall be held within the tributary
basin or at some nearby location convenient to the affected water users. The
department shall allow for both oral and written comments to be provided.
(4) The director may issue an order expanding the eastern Snake plain
aquifer area of common ground water supply after the hearing. Any person
aggrieved by the action of the director may contest such action pursuant to
section 42-1701A(3), Idaho Code.
SECTION 19. That Section 49-1613, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-1613. UNLAWFUL ACTS BY LICENSEE. (1) It shall be unlawful for the
holder of any license issued under the provisions of this chapter to:
(a) Intentionally publish or circulate any advertising that is mis-
leading or inaccurate in any material particular or that misrepresents
any of the products sold or furnished by a licensed dealer;
(b) Violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any of the applica-
ble rules;
(c) Knowingly purchase, sell or otherwise acquire or dispose of a
stolen vehicle;
(d) Violate any law respecting commerce in vehicles or any lawful rule
respecting commerce in vehicles promulgated by any licensing or regu-
lating authority now existing or hereafter created by the laws of the
state;
(e) Engage in the business for which the dealer is licensed without at
all times maintaining a principal place of business;
(f) Engage in a type of business respecting the selling or exchanging of
vehicles for which he is not licensed;
(g) Knowingly purchase a vehicle that has an altered or removed vehicle
identification number plate or alter or remove a vehicle identification
number plate;
(h) Violate any provision of this title or any rules promulgated;
(i) Violate any provision of the federal motor vehicle safety stan-
dards, federal odometer laws or regulations;
(j) Display for sale, exchange, or sell any vehicle for which the vehi-
cle dealer does not hold title or consignment agreement or other docu-
mentary evidence of his right to the possession of every vehicle in his
possession; or
(k) Issue more than one (1) temporary permit per vehicle sale pursuant
to the provisions set forth in section 49-504(6), Idaho Code.
(2) It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer or distributor licensed
under this chapter to require, attempt to require, coerce, or attempt to co-
erce, any new vehicle dealer in this state to:


(a) Order or accept delivery of any new vehicle, part or accessory,
equipment or any other commodity not required by law that shall not have
been voluntarily ordered by the new vehicle dealer. This paragraph is
not intended to modify or supersede any terms or provisions of a fran-
chise requiring dealers to market a representative line of vehicles
that the manufacturer or distributor is publicly advertising.
(b) Order or accept delivery of any new vehicle with special features,
accessories or equipment not included in the list price of such vehicles
as publicly advertised by the manufacturer or distributor.
(c) Participate monetarily in an advertising campaign or contest, or
to purchase any promotional materials, training materials, showroom or
other display decorations or materials at the expense of the dealer.
(d) Enter into any agreement with the manufacturer or distributor or to
do any other act prejudicial to the dealer by threatening to terminate
or cancel a franchise or any contractual agreement existing between
the dealer and the manufacturer or distributor. This paragraph is not
intended to preclude the manufacturer or distributor from insisting
on compliance with reasonable terms or provisions of the franchise or
other contractual agreement, and notice in good faith to any dealer of
the dealer's violation of those terms or provisions shall not consti-
tute a violation of the provisions of this chapter.
(e) Change the capital structure of the dealer or the means by or
through which the dealer finances the operation of the dealership,
provided that the dealer at all times meets any reasonable capital stan-
dards determined by the manufacturer or distributor in accordance with
uniformly applied criteria. No change in the capital structure shall
cause a change in the principal management or have the effect of a sale
of the franchise without the consent of the manufacturer or distribu-
tor. Consent shall not be unreasonably withheld.
(f) Refrain from participation in the management of, investment in, or
the acquisition of any other line of new vehicle or related products.
This paragraph does not apply unless the dealer maintains a reasonable
line of credit for each make or line of new vehicle, and the dealer re-
mains in compliance with any reasonable facilities requirements of the
manufacturer or distributor, and no change is made in the principal man-
agement of the dealership.
(g) Prospectively assent to a release, assignment, novation, waiver or
estoppel that would relieve any person from liability to be imposed by
this chapter or to require any controversy between a dealer and a man-
ufacturer, distributor, or representatives, to be referred to any per-
son other than the duly constituted courts of the state or the United
States, or to the director, if that referral would be binding upon the
dealer.
(h) Either establish or maintain exclusive facilities, personnel, or
display space.
(i) Expand facilities without a written guarantee of a sufficient sup-
ply of new vehicles so as to justify an expansion, in light of the market
and economic conditions.
(j) Make significant modifications to an existing dealership or to
construct a new vehicle dealership facility without providing a writ-


ten guarantee of a sufficient supply of new vehicles so as to justify
modification or construction, in light of the market and economic con-
ditions.
(3) It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer or distributor licensed
under this chapter to:
(a) Delay, refuse, or fail to deliver new vehicles or new vehicle parts
or accessories in a reasonable time, and in reasonable quantity, rela-
tive to the dealer's facilities and sales potential in the dealer's rel-
evant market area, after acceptance of an order from a dealer having a
franchise for the retail sale of any new vehicle sold or distributed by
the manufacturer or distributor, any new vehicle, parts or accessories
to new vehicles as are covered by the franchise, if the vehicle, parts,
or accessories are publicly advertised as being available for delivery
or actually being delivered. These provisions are not violated, how-
ever, if failure is caused by acts or causes beyond the control of the
manufacturer or distributor.
(b) Refuse to disclose to any dealer handling the same line, the manner
and mode of distribution of that line within this state.
(c) Obtain money, goods, service, or any other benefit from any other
person with whom the dealer does business, on account of, or in relation
to, the transaction between the dealer and other person, other than for
compensation for services rendered, unless the benefit is promptly ac-
counted for and transmitted to the dealer.
(d) Increase prices of new vehicles that the dealer had ordered for
consumers prior to the dealer's receipt of the written official price
increase notification. A sales contract signed by a consumer shall
constitute evidence of each such order, provided that the vehicle is in
fact delivered to that customer. In the event of manufacturer or dis-
tributor price reductions or cash rebates paid to the dealer, the amount
of any reduction or rebate received by a dealer shall be passed on to the
private retail consumer by the dealer. Price reductions shall apply to
all vehicles in the dealer's inventory that were subject to the price
reduction. Price differences applicable to new model or series shall
not be considered a price increase or price decrease. Price changes
caused by the addition to a vehicle of required or optional equipment,
or revaluation of the United States dollar, in the case of foreign-make
vehicles or components, or an increase in transportation charges due to
increased rates imposed by a carrier, shall not be subject to the provi-
sions of this subsection.
(e) Release to any outside party, except under subpoena or as other-
wise required by law or in an administrative, judicial or arbitration
proceeding involving the manufacturer or distributor or dealer, any
business, financial, or personal information which may be provided from
time to time by the dealer to the manufacturer or distributor without
the express written consent of the dealer.
(f) Deny any dealer the right of free association with any other dealer
for any lawful purpose.
(g) Compete with their franchised dealers in this state in the sale,
lease, or warranty service of new motor vehicles to retail consumers.
However, nothing in this section shall limit or apply to a manufac-


turer's or a distributor's fleet sales or leases with a fleet customer
that has a designation as such by the manufacturer or distributor as
long as such sales or leases are conducted with the involvement of a
dealer of the same line make. Nothing in this section shall limit or
prohibit a manufacturer or distributor from authorizing or assisting
a fleet customer that has a designation as such by the manufacturer or
distributor to perform warranty service on vehicles owned or operated
by such fleet customer. It is not a violation of this paragraph for a
manufacturer or distributor, or an affiliate of a manufacturer or dis-
tributor, to directly provide an update to or repair of motor vehicle
software if such update or repair is provided over-the-air at no cost or
when creating a new line of motor vehicles and using franchised deal-
ers to sell and service those vehicles. A manufacturer or distributor
may operate a dealership for a reasonable period not to exceed one (1)
year without violating this paragraph if such dealership is for sale to
any qualified independent person at a fair and reasonable price, or in
a relationship in which an independent person has made a significant
investment subject to loss in the dealership and can reasonably expect
to acquire full ownership of that dealership on reasonable terms and
conditions. Upon a showing of good cause by the manufacturer or dis-
tributor to the department, the period of temporary ownership may be
extended up to one (1) additional year, resulting in a maximum temporary
ownership period of two (2) years.
(h) Unfairly discriminate among its dealers with respect to warranty
reimbursement.
(i) Unreasonably withhold consent to the sale, transfer, or exchange of
the franchise to a qualified buyer capable of being licensed as a dealer
in this state or to condition the sale, transfer, or exchange of a fran-
chise agreement upon site control or an agreement to renovate or make
improvements to a facility, unless required by the technology of a motor
vehicle being sold at the facility. Provided however, that a voluntary
acceptance of such conditions by the dealer in writing including but not
limited to a written agreement for which the dealer has accepted sepa-
rate and valuable consideration, shall not constitute a violation.
(j) Fail to respond in writing to a request for consent as specified in
paragraph (i) of this subsection within sixty (60) days of receipt of a
written request on the forms, if any, generally utilized by the manufac-
turer or distributor for those purposes and containing the required in-
formation. Failure to respond shall be deemed to be consent to the re-
quest.
(k) Prevent or attempt to prevent, by contract or otherwise, any dealer
from changing the executive management control of the dealership unless
the manufacturer or distributor, having the burden of proof, can show
that the change of executive management will result in executive man-
agement or control by a person or persons who are not of good moral char-
acter or who do not meet reasonable, preexisting and, with considera-
tion given to the volume of sales and service of the dealership, uni-
formly applied minimum business experience standards. Where the manu-
facturer or distributor rejects a proposed change in executive manage-
ment control, the manufacturer or distributor shall give written notice


of his reasons to the dealer within sixty (60) days of notice to the man-
ufacturer or distributor by the dealer of the proposed change; other-
wise, the change in the executive management of the dealership shall be
presumptively considered approved.
(l) Terminate, cancel or fail to renew any franchise solely because of
the death or incapacity of an owner who is not listed in the franchise
as one on whose expertise and abilities the manufacturer or distributor
relied in the granting of the franchise.
(m) Prevent or attempt to prevent the dealer, by written instrument
or otherwise, from either receiving the fair market value of the deal-
ership in a sale transaction or from transferring the dealership to a
spouse or legal heir, as specified in this chapter.
(n) Engage in any predatory practice or discrimination against any
dealer.
(o) Resort to or to use any false or misleading advertisement in the
conducting of his business as a manufacturer or distributor in this
state.
(p) Make any false or misleading statement, either directly or through
any agent or employee, in order to induce any dealer to enter into any
agreement or franchise or to take any action that is prejudicial to that
dealer or his business.
(q) Require or coerce dealers to participate in local or national ad-
vertising campaigns or contests or to require or coerce dealers to pur-
chase promotional or display materials.
(r) Charge back, deny motor vehicle allocation, withhold payments, or
take other actions against a dealer, or to condition a franchise agree-
ment, or renewal of a franchise agreement, or to condition sales, ser-
vice, parts, or finance incentives upon site control or an agreement to
renovate or make improvements to a facility unless required by the tech-
nology of a motor vehicle being sold at the facility. Provided however,
that a voluntary acceptance of such conditions by the dealer in writing
including but not limited to a written agreement for which the dealer
has accepted separate and valuable consideration, shall not constitute
a violation.
(s) Charge back, deny motor vehicle allocation, withhold payments, or
take other actions against a motor vehicle dealer if a motor vehicle
sold by the motor vehicle dealer is exported from Idaho or the dealer's
assigned area of responsibility unless the manufacturer, distributor,
or manufacturer representative proves that the motor vehicle dealer
knew or reasonably should have known a motor vehicle was intended to
be exported, which shall operate as a rebuttable presumption that the
motor vehicle dealer did not have such knowledge. This paragraph does
not apply if exporting of motor vehicles outside of the state of Idaho is
provided for by the manufacturer or distributor.
(t) Withhold or threaten to withhold consent or approval of the sale,
transfer, exchange, or issuance of a dealer sales and service agreement
to an otherwise qualified buyer capable of being licensed as a dealer
in this state or to condition approval of such buyer upon the selling
dealer executing a release of all claims or similar instrument releas-
ing or waiving any and all claims the selling dealer has or may have


arising from the franchise relationship with the manufacturer unless
separate material consideration is paid contemporaneously by the manu-
facturer to the dealer for such release. Nothing in this section shall
preclude the application of a manufacturer's reasonable and uniform
standards and policies.
(4) It is unlawful for any manufacturer or distributor or any offi-
cer, agent or representative to coerce, or attempt to coerce, any dealer
in this state to offer to sell or sell any extended service contract or ex-
tended maintenance plan that is offered, sold, backed by or sponsored by
the manufacturer or distributor or to sell, assign or transfer any retail
installment sales contract, obtained by the dealer in connection with the
sale by him in this state of new vehicles, manufactured or sold by the man-
ufacturer or distributor, to a specified finance company or class of such
companies, or to any other specified person, by any of the acts or means set
forth, namely by:
(a) Any statement, suggestion, promise or threat that the manufac-
turer or distributor will, in any manner, benefit or injure the dealer,
whether the statement, suggestion, threat or promise is express or im-
plied or made directly or indirectly;
(b) Any act that will benefit or injure the dealer;
(c) Any contract, or any express or implied offer of contract, made
directly or indirectly to a dealer for handling new vehicles, on the
condition that the dealer shall offer to sell or sell any extended
service contract or extended maintenance plan that is offered, sold,
backed by, or sponsored by the manufacturer or distributor or sell, as-
sign or transfer his retail installment sales contract in this state to
a specified finance company or class of such companies, or to any other
specified person; or
(d) Any express or implied statement or representation made directly or
indirectly that the dealer is under any obligation whatsoever to offer
to sell or sell any extended service contract or extended maintenance
plan that is offered, sold, backed by, or sponsored by the manufacturer
or distributor or to sell, assign or transfer any of his retail sales
contracts, in this state, on new vehicles manufactured or sold by that
manufacturer or distributor to a finance company or class of companies,
or other specified person, because of any relationship or affiliation
between the manufacturer or distributor and a finance company or compa-
nies, or a specified person or persons.
(e) Nothing contained in this subsection shall prohibit a manufacturer
or distributor from offering or providing incentive benefits or bonus
programs to a retail motor vehicle dealer or prospective retail motor
vehicle dealer in this state who makes the voluntary decision to offer
to sell or sell any extended service contract or extended maintenance
plan offered, sold, backed by or sponsored by the manufacturer or dis-
tributor to sell, assign or transfer any retail installment sale or
lease by him in this state of motor vehicles manufactured or sold by the
manufacturer or distributor to a specified finance company or leasing
company controlled by or affiliated with the manufacturer or distribu-
tor.


Any statement, threats, promises, acts, contracts or offers of con-
tracts, when the effect may be to lessen or eliminate competition or tend to
create a monopoly, are declared unfair trade practices and unfair methods of
competition, against the policy of this state, and are unlawful.
(5) It is unlawful for any manufacturer or distributor or agent or em-
ployee of a manufacturer or distributor to use a written instrument, agree-
ment, or waiver to attempt to nullify any of the provisions of this section,
and such agreement, written instrument or waiver shall be null and void.
(6) It shall be unlawful, directly or indirectly, to impose unrea-
sonable restrictions on the dealer relative to the sale, transfer, right
to renew, termination discipline, noncompetition covenants, site control
(whether by sublease, collateral pledge of lease, or otherwise), right of
first refusal to purchase, option to purchase, compliance with subjective
standards and assertion of legal or equitable rights.
(7) The provisions of this chapter shall apply to all written franchise
agreements between a manufacturer or distributor and a dealer, including
the franchise offering, the franchise agreement, sales of goods, services
or advertising, leases or mortgages of real or personal property, promises
to pay, security interests, pledges, insurance contract, advertising con-
tract, construction or installation contract, servicing contracts and all
other agreements where the manufacturer or distributor has any direct or
indirect interest.
(8)(a) It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer or distributor,
whether by agreement, program, incentive provision, or provision for
loss of incentive payments or other benefits, to establish or implement
a franchise agreement for the sales and leasing of new motor vehicles
under which the manufacturer or distributor reserves the right to:
(i) Maintain a website or other electronic or digital means of
communication for the manufacturer or distributor to negotiate
binding terms of sale or leasing of new motor vehicles directly
with the retail buyer or lessee without the involvement of a dealer
on prices or other substantive terms of sale or leasing of new ve-
hicles;
(ii) Retain ownership of new motor vehicles until they are sold or
leased to the retail buyer or lessee;
(iii) Except for the sale or lease of a vehicle to a bona fide em-
ployee or relative of such manufacturer or distributor or in con-
nection with a replacement or buyback, or to a bona fide employee
or relative of a dealer under an employee pricing or similar pro-
gram, consign new motor vehicles to dealers for dealer inventory
or for sale or lease to a retail buyer or lessee;
(iv) Negotiate binding terms of sale directly with retail buy-
ers or lessees of new motor vehicles without the involvement of a
dealer, provided that displaying on a website or other electronic
or digital means of communication conditional prices, available
financing sources, or conditional trade-in values that are not
binding on a dealer shall not be considered negotiating;
(v) Enforce or seek to enforce a right in any franchise agreement
for the manufacturer or distributor to unilaterally amend or mod-
ify the franchise agreement; or


(vi) Amend or modify or attempt to amend or modify any dealer sales
and service agreement, including but not limited to the dealer's
relevant market area if the amendment or modification substan-
tially and adversely affects the dealer's rights, obligations,
investment or return on investment, without giving sixty (60) days
advance written notice of the proposed amendment or modification
to the dealer.
(b) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a manufacturer or distrib-
utor from:
(i) Participating in fleet sales or leasing with a fleet customer
that has a designation as such by the manufacturer or distributor
as long as such sales or leases are conducted with the involvement
of a dealer of the same line make;
(ii) Authorizing or assisting a fleet customer that has a des-
ignation as such by the manufacturer or distributor to perform
warranty service on vehicles owned or operated by such fleet cus-
tomers;
(iii) Offering, providing, and applying the terms of an employee
pricing or similar program with participating dealers;
(iv) Negotiating binding terms of sale relating to the sale or
lease of a vehicle to a bona fide employee or relative of such manu-
facturer or distributor;
(v) Negotiating binding terms of sale relating to the sale or
lease of a vehicle to a bona fide employee or relative of a fran-
chised dealer under an employee pricing program or similar pro-
gram;
(vi) Negotiating binding terms of sale relating to the sale or
lease of a vehicle in connection with a vehicle replacement or buy-
back;
(vii) Purchasing from a consumer a vehicle in connection with a ve-
hicle replacement or buyback;
(viii) Maintaining a website or other electronic or digital means
of communication if the final selling or leasing price of the new
vehicle is determined by eligible dealers; or
(ix) Setting or advertising a manufacturer's suggested retail
price or lease example pricing based on a manufacturer's suggested
retail price, special financing, or lease offers.
(9)(a) Within the sixty (60) day notice period provided for in sub-
section (8)(a)(vii) (8)(a)(vi) of this section, the dealer may pursue
remedies under section 49-1617, Idaho Code, and file with the depart-
ment and serve upon the respondent a petition to determine whether
good cause exists for permitting the proposed modification. Multiple
complaints pertaining to the same proposed modification may be con-
solidated for hearing. The proposed modification may not take effect
pending the determination of any protest filed by a dealer. In making a
determination of whether there is good cause for permitting a proposed
modification of a dealer sales and service agreement, including but not
limited to a dealer's relevant market area, the burden of proof shall be
on the manufacturer or distributor, except that the burden of proof with
regard to the factor set forth in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph


shall be on the dealer. The department shall consider any relevant fac-
tor, including:
(i) The reasons for the proposed modification;
(ii) Whether the proposed modification is applied to or affects
all motor vehicle dealers in a nondiscriminatory manner;
(iii) The degree to which the proposed modification will have
a substantial and adverse effect on the motor vehicle dealer's
rights, investment, or return on investment; and
(iv) Whether the proposed modification is in the public interest.
(b) With respect to a proposed modification of a dealer's relevant mar-
ket area the department shall also consider:
(i) The traffic patterns between consumers and the same line-
make franchised dealers of the affected manufacturer or distrib-
utor who are located within the market;
(ii) The pattern of new vehicle sales and registrations of the af-
fected manufacturer or distributor within various portions of the
relevant market area and within the market as a whole;
(iii) The growth or decline in population, density of population,
and new car registrations in the market;
(iv) The presence or absence of natural geographical obstacles or
boundaries;
(v) The proximity of census tracts or other geographic units used
by the affected manufacturer or distributor in determining the
same line-make dealers' respective relevant market area; and
(vi) The reasonableness of the change or proposed change to the
dealer's relevant market area, considering the benefits and harm
to the petitioning dealer, other same line-make dealers, and the
manufacturer or distributor.
(10) It shall be unlawful for any manufacturer or distributor to imple-
ment a program or policy that coerces or requires the franchisee to install
direct current fast charging stations for public access or use or any simi-
lar public-facing infrastructure relating to charging, fueling, or powering
a vehicle. For purposes of this section, the term "coerce" means the use of
force or threats to compel a dealer to take a specific action. "Coerce" in-
cludes threatening to withhold vehicles or parts from a franchisee or charg-
ing a franchisee a higher price for vehicles or parts on the basis of the
franchisee refusing, declining, or failing to perform a specific behavior.
Provided, however, that nothing contained in this subsection shall be deemed
to prohibit or prevent a manufacturer or distributor from requiring a fran-
chisee to purchase special tools or equipment, install reasonable charging
infrastructure, stock reasonable quantities of certain parts, or partici-
pate in training, reasonable sales and service programs, or policies that
are reasonably necessary for such franchisee to sell or service any model or
series of vehicles.
SECTION 20. That Section 54-1810, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1810. PHYSICIAN LICENSURE BY WRITTEN EXAMINATION. Any person seek-
ing to be licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine as a physi-


cian in this state must successfully complete the following requirements be-
fore a license will be issued:
(1) Each applicant must submit a completed written application to the
board on forms furnished by the board, which shall require proof of gradua-
tion from a medical school acceptable to the board and successful completion
of a postgraduate training program acceptable to the board. The application
shall require a fingerprint-based criminal history check in accordance with
section 67-9411A, Idaho Code. ,
(2) Each applicant must pass an examination conducted by or acceptable
to the board that shall thoroughly test the applicant's fitness to practice
medicine. If an applicant fails to pass any step of the examination on two
(2) separate occasions, the applicant may be required to be interviewed,
evaluated, or examined by the board.
(3) The board may require an applicant to be personally interviewed by
the board or a designated committee of the board. Such an interview shall be
limited to a review of the applicant's qualifications and professional cre-
dentials.
(4) For an international physician licensed pursuant to section
54-1812, Idaho Code, successful completion of the three (3) year provisional
license period shall constitute a postgraduate training experience accept-
able to the board.
SECTION 21. That Section 54-2018, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-2018. LICENSE RENEWALS -- INACTIVE LICENSE STATUS -- PERSONAL
CHANGES -- EFFECTIVE DATES -- FEES NONREFUNDABLE. (1) Initial license pe-
riod. Each new license shall be for a period of one (1) year plus the months
up to and including the next birthday of the licensee, not to exceed a period
of two (2) years, and shall expire on the birthday of the licensee. A sales-
person licensed in this state who applies for and obtains a broker license
shall retain the license renewal period and expiration date of his salesper-
son license. Corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies and
other entities defined as "persons" in this chapter shall have established
as the equivalent of a birth date, the birth date of its designated broker
in accordance with the provisions of section 67-2614, Idaho Code. Licensed
branch offices shall have established as the equivalent of a birth date, the
birth date of the designated broker for the branch office.
(2) License renewal. Each license shall be renewable in accordance
with the provisions of section 67-2614, Idaho Code.
(a) If renewing an active license, the application shall include:
(i) Certification that the applicant has met the commis-
sion's continuing education requirements as set forth in section
54-2023, Idaho Code;
(ii) Certification that the applicant has met the mandatory
errors and omissions insurance requirement for real estate li-
censees as set forth in section 54-2013, Idaho Code; and
(iii) Payment of all renewal fees established by this chapter or by
the commission.


(b) If renewing an inactive license, the application shall include pay-
ment of all renewal fees established by this chapter or by the commis-
sion by rule.
(3) Late renewal. If the licensee fails to submit a completed applica-
tion for renewal or pay the renewal fee on or before the expiration date, the
commission may accept a later application or payment of the fee, subject to
such conditions as the commission may require including, but not limited to,
the assessment of a late fee; provided that between the license expiration
date and the date of renewal of the license, the rights of the licensee under
such license shall be expired, and during such period of expiration it shall
be unlawful for any licensee to do or attempt to offer to do any of the acts
of the kind and nature described in the definitions of real estate broker or
real estate salesperson in section 54-2004, Idaho Code, in consideration of
compensation of any kind or expectation thereof. An expired license that is
not renewed within one (1) year of the expiration date shall be automatically
terminated by the commission and may not be renewed.
(4) Active and inactive license status. A licensee who is a designated
broker or associated with a designated broker shall hold an active license.
A licensee who has paid all applicable fees, who is not associated with a des-
ignated broker and who holds a current license that is not revoked, suspended
or terminated shall hold his license on inactive status. A licensee seeking
to change from active license status to inactive license status shall have
the broker submit a change of status application to the commission in the
form and manner approved by the commission. During the period that his li-
cense is inactive, the licensee shall not engage in the business or act in the
capacity of real estate broker, associate broker or salesperson. However,
an inactive licensee may receive a referral fee for any referral made during
the period his license was active. A licensee may activate an inactive li-
cense by meeting each of the following:
(a) If activating as a sales associate, associating with a designated
Idaho broker and having the broker submit an application in the form and
manner approved by the commission;
(b) If activating as a designated broker, establishing an office in the
manner required by this chapter and submitting an application in the
form and manner approved by the commission;
(c) Paying any required fees;
(d) Obtaining and maintaining a policy of errors and omissions insur-
ance as required by section 54-2013, Idaho Code, and in accordance with
the rules of the commission and certifying the same; and
(e) Successfully completing any continuing education requirements, as
prescribed in section 54-2023, Idaho Code, and certifying the same for
the current license period.
(5) Continuing education. A licensee shall not submit an application
to renew a license on active status or to activate an inactive license with-
out having obtained the continuing education credit hours required by sec-
tion 54-2023, Idaho Code. A licensee who violates this subsection shall be
subject to disciplinary action by the commission.
(6) Time required. The commission may request satisfactory proof of
continuing education compliance from any licensee who has certified to the
commission that he has completed the requirement. The request shall state


the time within which the proof must be received at the commission office,
which time shall not be less than ten (10) business days.
(7) Satisfactory proof. Upon request from the commission, the licensee
shall submit satisfactory proof of having met the continuing education re-
quirement set forth in section 54-2023, Idaho Code. "Satisfactory proof"
shall, for each course, consist of documentation:
(a) Identifying the licensee, the title of the course, the course cer-
tification number, the course provider, the number of classroom hours,
the completion date of the course, and including:
(i) A transcript of the course taken;
(ii) A letter from the provider verifying successful completion
of the course; or
(iii) A course completion certificate; and
(b) Identifying the course certification approval number to establish
that the course is approved for continuing education credit as provided
by section 54-2023, Idaho Code. The commission may, in its sole discre-
tion, accept alternative documentation establishing that the course is
approved for credit.
(8) Failure to submit proof. A licensee failing to submit satisfac-
tory proof of completing the continuing education requirement after being
requested to do so by the commission may have his license inactivated by the
commission and shall not be entitled to reactivate the license unless and un-
til he provides to the commission satisfactory proof that he meets the con-
tinuing education requirements of section 54-2023, Idaho Code. Nothing in
this section shall limit the ability of the commission to investigate or dis-
cipline a licensee for violating subsection (5) of this section or for vio-
lating any other section of this chapter.
(9) Change in personal information. An individual licensee, whether
active or inactive, shall provide written notice to the commission, in the
form and manner approved by the commission, of any change of his personal
name, address of personal residence or personal telephone number. Notice
shall be provided within ten (10) business days of the change. If the li-
censee has changed his personal name, he shall also submit legal proof of the
change and, if an active licensee, he shall have the broker submit the writ-
ten notice of change to the commission.
(10) Issuance of the license and effective date. A real estate license
shall be deemed issued, and any requested license changes shall become ef-
fective, when the completed application, attachments, and any required fees
are received at and approved by the commission. An application that is in-
complete or lacking the required fees shall be returned to the applicant and
no license shall be issued until a completed application and all required
fees are received at and actually approved by the commission. A brokerage is
not required to obtain, display or possess a physical license certificate as
evidence of the individual's active licensure; however, the commission may
make license certificates available for a fee as authorized by this chapter.
A brokerage shall not display or otherwise make available to the public a li-
cense certificate for any individual who does not hold an active license with
the brokerage.
(11) Fees nonrefundable. No licensee shall be entitled to a refund of
any fee after the license or license change has become effective.


SECTION 22. That Section 54-5504, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-5504. RULEMAKING. (1) The rules adopted by the board shall:
(a) Allow a midwife to obtain and administer, during the practice of
midwifery, the following:
(i) Oxygen;
(ii) Oxytocin, misoprostol, and methylergonovine as postpartum
antihemorrhagic agents;
(iii) Injectable local anesthetic for the repair of lacerations
that are no more extensive than second degree;
(iv) Antibiotics to the mother for group b streptococcus prophy-
laxis consistent with guidelines of the United States centers for
disease control and prevention;
(v) Epinephrine to the mother administered for anaphylactic
shock;
(vi) Intravenous fluids for stabilization of the mother;
(vii) Rho(d) Rho (D) immune globulin;
(viii) Phytonadione; and
(ix) Eye prophylactics to the child.
(b) Prohibit the use of other legend drugs, except those of a similar
nature and character as determined by the board to be consistent with
the practice of midwifery; provided that at least one hundred twenty
(120) days' advance notice of the proposal to allow the use of such drugs
is given to the board of pharmacy and the board of medicine and neither
board objects to the addition of such drugs to the midwifery formulary;
(c) Define a protocol for use by licensed midwives of drugs approved in
paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection that shall include methods of
obtaining, storing, and disposing of such drugs and an indication for
use, dosage, route of administration, and duration of treatment;
(d) Define a protocol for medical waste disposal; and
(e) Establish scope and practice standards for antepartum, intra-
partum, postpartum, and newborn care that shall, at a minimum:
(i) Prohibit a licensed midwife from providing care for a client
with a history of disorders, diagnoses, conditions, or symptoms
that include:
1. Placental abnormality;
2. Multiple gestation, except that midwives may provide an-
tepartum care that is supplementary to the medical care of
the physician overseeing the pregnancy, as long as it does
not interfere with the physician's recommended schedule of
care;
3. Noncephalic presentation at the onset of labor or rupture
of membranes, whichever occurs first;
4. Birth under thirty-seven and zero-sevenths (37 0/7)
weeks and beyond forty-two and zero-sevenths (42 0/7) weeks
gestational age;
5. A history of more than one (1) prior cesarean section,
a cesarean section within eighteen (18) months of the esti-


mated due date or any cesarean section that was surgically
closed with a classical or vertical uterine incision;
6. Platelet sensitization, hematological, or coagulation
disorders;
7. A body mass index of forty (40.0) or higher at the time of
conception;
8. Prior chemotherapy and/or radiation treatment for a ma-
lignancy;
9. Previous preeclampsia resulting in premature delivery;
10. Cervical insufficiency;
11. HIV positive status; or
12. Opiate use that places the infant at risk of neonatal ab-
stinence syndrome.
(ii) Prohibit a licensed midwife from providing care for a client
with a history of the following disorders, diagnoses, conditions,
or symptoms, unless such disorders, diagnoses, conditions, or
symptoms are being treated, monitored, or managed by a licensed
health care provider:
1. Diabetes;
2. Thyroid disease;
3. Epilepsy;
4. Hypertension;
5. Cardiac disease;
6. Pulmonary disease;
7. Renal disease;
8. Gastrointestinal disorders;
9. Previous major surgery of the pulmonary system, cardio-
vascular system, urinary tract, or gastrointestinal tract;
10. Abnormal cervical cytology;
11. Sleep apnea;
12. Previous bariatric surgery;
13. Hepatitis;
14. History of illegal drug use or excessive prescription
drug use; or
15. Rh or other blood group disorders and a physician deter-
mines the pregnancy can safely be attended by a midwife.
(iii) Require a licensed midwife to recommend that a client see
a physician licensed pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho
Code, or an equivalent provision of the law of a state bordering
Idaho and to document and maintain a record as required by section
54-5510, Idaho Code, if such client has a history of disorders,
diagnoses, conditions, or symptoms that include:
1. Previous complicated pregnancy;
2. Previous cesarean section;
3. Previous pregnancy loss in second or third trimester;
4. Previous spontaneous premature labor;
5. Previous preterm rupture of membranes;
6. Previous preeclampsia;
7. Previous hypertensive disease of pregnancy;
8. Parvo;


9. Toxo;
10. CMV;
11. HSV;
12. Previous maternal/newborn group b streptococcus infec-
tion;
13. A body mass index of at least thirty-five (35.0) but less
than forty (40.0) at the time of conception;
14. Underlying family genetic disorders with potential for
transmission; or
15. Psychosocial situations that may complicate pregnancy.
(iv) Require that a licensed midwife facilitate the immediate
transfer to a hospital for emergency care for disorders, diag-
noses, conditions, or symptoms that include:
1. Maternal fever in labor;
2. Suggestion of fetal jeopardy, such as bleeding or meco-
nium or abnormal fetal heart tones;
3. Noncephalic presentation at the onset of labor or rup-
ture of membranes, whichever occurs first, unless imminent
delivery is safer than transfer;
4. Second-stage labor after two (2) hours of initiation of
pushing when the mother has had a previous cesarean section;
5. Current spontaneous premature labor;
6. Current preterm premature rupture of membranes;
7. Current preeclampsia;
8. Current hypertensive disease of pregnancy;
9. Continuous uncontrolled bleeding;
10. Bleeding that necessitates the administration of more
than two (2) doses of oxytocin or other antihemorrhagic
agent;
11. Delivery injuries to the bladder or bowel;
12. Grand mal seizure;
13. Uncontrolled vomiting;
14. Coughing or vomiting of blood;
15. Severe chest pain; or
16. Sudden onset of shortness of breath and associated la-
bored breathing.
A transfer of care shall be accompanied by the client's medical
record, the licensed midwife's assessment of the client's current
condition, and a description of the care provided by the licensed
midwife prior to transfer;
(v) Establish a written plan for the emergency transfer and
transport required in subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph and for
notifying the hospital to which a client will be transferred in
the case of an emergency. If a client is transferred in an emer-
gency, the licensed midwife shall notify the hospital when the
transfer is initiated and accompany the client to the hospital if
feasible, or communicate by telephone with the hospital if unable
to be present personally, and shall provide the client's medi-
cal record. The record shall include the client's name, address,
list of diagnosed medical conditions, list of prescription or


over-the-counter medications regularly taken, history of previ-
ous allergic reactions to medications, if feasible, the client's
current medical condition and description of the care provided by
the midwife, and next-of-kin contact information. A midwife who
deems it necessary to transfer or terminate care pursuant to this
section and any rules promulgated pursuant to this section or for
any other reason shall transfer or terminate care and shall not be
regarded as having abandoned care or wrongfully terminated ser-
vices. Before nonemergent discontinuing of services, the midwife
shall notify the client in writing, provide the client with names
of licensed physicians and contact information for the nearest
hospital emergency room, and offer to provide copies of medical
records regardless of whether copying costs have been paid by the
client.
(f) Establish and operate a system of peer review for licensed midwives
that shall include but not be limited to the appropriateness, quality,
utilization, and ethical performance of midwifery care.
(2) The rules adopted by the board may not:
(a) Require a licensed midwife to have a nursing degree or diploma;
(b) Except as a condition imposed by disciplinary proceedings by the
board, require a licensed midwife to practice midwifery under the su-
pervision of another health care provider;
(c) Except as a condition imposed by disciplinary proceedings by the
board, require a licensed midwife to enter into an agreement, written or
otherwise, with another health care provider;
(d) Limit the location where a licensed midwife may practice midwifery;
(e) Allow a licensed midwife to use vacuum extraction or forceps as an
aid in the delivery of a newborn;
(f) Grant a licensed midwife prescriptive privilege; or
(g) Allow a licensed midwife to perform abortions.
SECTION 23. That Section 55-3203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
55-3203. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Board" means the entity that has the duty of governing the home-
owner's association and may be referred to as a board of directors, executive
board, or any other such similar name.
(2) "Community manager" means a person or agent who provides for or oth-
erwise engages in the management of a common interest community or the man-
agement of a homeowner's association.
(3) "Financial disclosure" means the accounting records of the organi-
zation that are kept, disclosed, and made available for inspection in accor-
dance with part 11, chapter 30, title 30, Idaho Code, and the governing docu-
ments of the homeowner's association.
(4) "Governing documents" means a written instrument by which the home-
owner's association may exercise powers or manage, maintain, or otherwise
affect the property under the jurisdiction of the homeowner's association.
Governing documents includes but is not limited to articles of incorpora-
tion, bylaws, a plat, rules of the homeowner's association, and any declara-
tion of covenants, conditions, and restrictions.


(5)(a) "Homeowner's association" means any incorporated or unincorpo-
rated association:
(i) In which membership is based on owning or possessing an inter-
est in real property; and
(ii) That has the authority, pursuant to recorded covenants, by-
laws, or other governing documents, to assess and record liens
against the real property of its members.
(b) "Homeowner's association" includes the following persons who may
or may not be members of a homeowner's association or serve on the board
of a homeowner's association:
(i) A community manager pursuant to a contract with a homeowner's
association; and
(ii) An agent or person with explicit or apparent authority to act
on behalf of a homeowner's association.
(6) "Member" or "membership" means any person or entity owning or pos-
sessing an interest in residential real property or a lot within the physical
boundaries of an established homeowner's association.
(6) (7) "Transfer fee" means a fee, charge, or assessment, as that term
is described in chapter 31, title 55, Idaho Code, charged by the homeowner's
association and payable to the homeowner's association upon the transfer
of an interest in real property that is under the jurisdiction of the home-
owner's association.
SECTION 24. That Section 56-270, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section 1,
Chapter 204, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
56-270 56-271. MEDICAID BUDGET STABILIZATION FUND. There is hereby
created in the state treasury the medicaid budget stabilization fund. By the
close of fiscal year 2025 or as soon thereafter as practicable, a total of
twelve million dollars ($12,000,000) of all unobligated general fund moneys
remaining in the cooperative welfare fund from appropriations made to the
division of medicaid shall be transferred to the Idaho millennium income
fund established in section 67-1806, Idaho Code. Beginning in fiscal year
2024 and each year thereafter, the remainder of any unobligated general fund
moneys remaining in the cooperative welfare fund from appropriations made
to the division of medicaid shall be transferred to the medicaid budget sta-
bilization fund following the department of health and welfare's year-end
reconciliation. Moneys in the medicaid budget stabilization fund shall
consist of such transfers and such other moneys that may be provided by leg-
islative appropriation. The state treasurer shall invest idle moneys in the
medicaid budget stabilization fund, and the interest earned on such moneys
shall be retained by the fund. Moneys in the medicaid budget stabilization
fund shall be expended solely for the purpose of meeting general fund revenue
shortfalls or covering unanticipated expenses for services administered by
the division of medicaid and shall only be expended pursuant to legislative
appropriation.
SECTION 25. That Section 56-270, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section 1,
Chapter 288, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:


56-270 56-272. LEGISLATIVE APPROVAL OF WAIVERS AND STATE PLAN AMEND-
MENTS. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state
department of health and welfare shall not seek or implement a medicaid state
plan amendment or a waiver pursuant to section 1115 or 1915 of the social
security act that would expand coverage to any additional individuals or
class of individuals or would increase any cost to the state without first
obtaining approval from the legislature. Such approval must be provided
in statute. The provisions of this section shall not affect any state plan
amendment or waiver program already implemented as of the effective date of
this section.
SECTION 26. That Section 56-270, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section 3,
Chapter 209, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
56-270 56-273. PROHIBITION ON REIMBURSEMENT AND COVERAGE. (1) Pur-
suant to chapter 89, title 18, Idaho Code, the Idaho medicaid program shall
not reimburse or provide coverage for any surgical operation or medical
intervention described in section 18-1506C(3), Idaho Code, for purposes of
altering the appearance of an individual in order to affirm the individual's
perception of the individual's sex in a way that is inconsistent with the
individual's biological sex regardless of whether the surgical operation
or medical intervention is administered to a minor or an adult, except ex-
empted surgical operations or medical interventions described in section
18-8901(1), Idaho Code.
(2) The department of health and welfare and any other state agency who
provides medicaid services shall promulgate rules, subject to legislative
approval, directing medicaid provider agreements to contain certifications
that no public funds have been used in violation of section 18-8901, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 27. That Section 56-270, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section 1,
Chapter 149, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
56-270 56-274. MEDICAID LEGISLATIVE REVIEW PANEL. (1) A medicaid leg-
islative review panel is hereby established.
(2) The cochairs of the panel shall be the chair of the house health and
welfare committee and the chair of the senate health and welfare committee.
Additional members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of repre-
sentatives and the president pro tempore of the senate, and at least one (1)
senator and one (1) representative shall be members of the minority caucus.
(3) The medicaid legislative review panel shall be staffed by the leg-
islative services office.
(4) The medicaid legislative review panel shall meet at the direction
of the cochairs to review contracts related to medicaid, to make recommenda-
tions on key indicators and performance measures to be included in any med-
icaid contract, to recommend any data to be collected as a part of a medic-
aid contract, and other duties as determined by the legislature, legislative
council, or initiative of the cochairs of the panel.


(5) The medicaid legislative review panel shall prepare a report summa-
rizing activities undertaken and any recommendations made and shall submit
that report to the legislative council.
SECTION 28. That Chapter 19, Title 56, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section
1, Chapter 224, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as
follows:
CHAPTER 19 20
PREEMPTION OF GUARANTEED INCOME PROGRAMS
56-1901 56-2001. DEFINITION. As used in this chapter, "guaranteed in-
come program" means a plan funded or administered by the government under
which an individual is provided with regular, unconditional cash payments to
be used for any purpose by the individual. "Guaranteed income program" does
not include a program under which an individual is required to seek reemploy-
ment, perform work, or attend training as a condition of any payments.
56-1902 56-2002. PREEMPTION. Except as expressly authorized by state
statute, a county, city, agency, board, or any other political subdivision
of this state shall not adopt or enforce any law, rule, regulation, or ordi-
nance for the purpose of making payments to individuals under a guaranteed
income program. Any law, rule, regulation, or ordinance prohibited by this
chapter is null and void.
SECTION 29. That Chapter 19, Title 56, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section
1, Chapter 264, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as
follows:
CHAPTER 19 21
CRISIS RESPONSE FOR PERSONS WITH A NEUROCOGNITIVE DISORDER
56-1901 56-2101. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legis-
lature that persons with a neurocognitive disorder who are in acute crisis
due to an unidentified underlying medical condition can get the care they
need and return home once the underlying medical condition is resolved. The
legislature further intends that state agencies and community partners will
collaborate to provide the most dignified care for persons with a neurocog-
nitive disorder.
56-1902 56-2102. GOVERNMENTAL LIABILITY. All provisions of chapter 9,
title 6, Idaho Code, shall apply to any claim of tortious conduct on the part
of a person action acting or refusing to act in conformance with this chap-
ter.
56-1903 56-2103. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Department" means the state department of health and welfare.
(2) "Health care provider" means a person licensed, certified, or
otherwise authorized by law to administer health care services in the ordi-
nary course of business or practice of a profession, including a physician,
physician assistant, and advanced practice registered nurse.


(3) "Health care services" means services for the diagnosis, preven-
tion, treatment, cure, or relief of a health condition, illness, injury, or
disease.
(4) "Hospital" means a medical hospital as defined in section 39-1301,
Idaho Code, including freestanding emergency departments.
(5) "Likely to injure themselves or others" means:
(a) A substantial risk that serious physical harm will be inflicted by
the person upon their own person, as evidenced by threats of suicide or
threats to inflict serious physical harm on themselves;
(b) A substantial risk that serious physical harm will be inflicted by
the person upon another as evidenced by behavior that has caused such
harm or that places another person or persons in reasonable fear of sus-
taining such harm; or
(c) The person lacks insight into the need for treatment and is unable
or unwilling to comply with treatment based on the person's medical
history, clinical observation, or other clinical evidence, and if the
person does not receive and comply with treatment, there is a substan-
tial risk that the person will continue to physically, emotionally,
or cognitively deteriorate to the point that the person will, in the
reasonably near future, inflict serious physical harm on themselves or
another person.
(6) "Neurocognitive disorder" has the same meaning as provided in sec-
tion 66-317(13), Idaho Code, except that for purposes of this chapter neu-
rocognitive disorder does not include decreased mental function due to inap-
propriate use or abuse of substances or medications.
(7) "Peace officer" means an employee of a law enforcement agency that
is a part of or administered by the state or any political subdivision of the
state and whose duties include and primarily consist of the prevention and
detection of crime and the enforcement of penal, traffic, or highway laws
of the state or any political subdivision of the state. Peace officer also
means an employee of a police or law enforcement agency of a federally recog-
nized Indian tribe who has satisfactorily completed the peace officer stan-
dards and training academy and has been deputized by a sheriff of a county or
a chief of police of a city of the state of Idaho.
(8) "Protective custody" means when a peace officer detains a person
and takes such person to a hospital. The peace officer shall make every rea-
sonable effort to protect the person's health and safety while the peace of-
ficer takes reasonable steps to protect the peace officer's safety. Protec-
tive custody under this section is not an arrest.
56-1904 56-2104. PROTECTIVE CUSTODY WITHOUT HEARING. (1) No person
shall be taken into protective custody or detained as an alleged emergency
patient for observation, diagnosis, evaluation, care or treatment of a
neurocognitive disorder unless and until the court has ordered such ap-
prehension and custody pursuant to section 56-1905 56-2105, Idaho Code;
provided, however, that a person may be taken into custody by a peace officer
and placed in a hospital, or the person may be detained at a hospital at which
the person presented or was brought to receive medical care, if the peace
officer or a health care provider in such hospital has reason to believe
that person has a neurocognitive disorder and the person is likely to injure


themselves or others; provided, under no circumstances shall the person be
detained in a nonmedical unit used for the detention of persons charged with
or convicted of penal offenses. Whenever a person is taken into custody or
detained pursuant to this section without a court order, the evidence sup-
porting the claim that the person with the neurocognitive disorder is likely
to injure themselves or others must be presented to a duly authorized court
within twenty-four (24) hours from the time the person was placed in custody
or detained.
(2) If the court finds there is reason to believe the person is likely
to have a neurocognitive disorder and likely to injure themselves or others
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the court shall issue a temporary
protective placement custody order requiring the person to be held in a hos-
pital and requiring an examination of the person by a health care provider in
such hospital within twenty-four (24) hours of the entry of the order of the
court. Under no circumstances shall the person be detained in a nonmedical
unit used for the detention of persons charged with or convicted of penal of-
fenses.
(3) Where an examination is required pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, the health care provider in such hospital shall make findings and
report to the court within twenty-four (24) hours of the examination.
(4) If at any time after the person is placed in protective custody the
health care provider in such hospital conducting the examination determines
the person no longer meets criteria for protective custody, the person shall
be deemed to be a voluntary patient and subject to release.
(5) If the health care provider in such hospital finds, in an examina-
tion pursuant to this section, that the person is likely to have a neurocog-
nitive disorder and is likely to injure themselves or others, the prosecut-
ing attorney shall file, within twenty-four (24) hours of the examination
of the person, a petition with the court requesting the person's continued
protective placement pending review proceedings pursuant to section 56-1905
56-2105, Idaho Code.
(6) Upon the receipt of such a petition, the court shall order the per-
son's detention to await hearing, which shall be within five (5) days, in-
cluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, of the protective placement
order. If no petition is filed within twenty-four (24) hours of the exami-
nation described in subsection (5) of this section, the person shall be re-
leased from the protective placement.
(7) Upon taking a person into custody, a good faith effort shall be made
to provide notice to the person's legal guardian, parent, spouse, or adult
next of kin of the person's physical whereabouts and the reasons for taking
the person into custody.
(8) Nothing in this section shall preclude a hospital from transferring
a person who has been detained pursuant to this section to another hospital
that is willing to accept the transferred person for purposes of observa-
tion, diagnosis, evaluation, care, or treatment.
56-1905 56-2105. PROTECTIVE CUSTODY UPON COURT ORDER -- JUDICIAL PRO-
CEDURE. (1) Proceedings by a hospital for the involuntary care and treatment
of persons likely to have a neurocognitive disorder who are in acute crisis
due to an underlying medical condition may be commenced by the filing of a


written application for emergency protective placement with a court of com-
petent jurisdiction by a friend, relative, spouse, or guardian of the per-
son, by a health care provider practicing in a hospital, by a prosecuting at-
torney or other public official of a municipality, county, or the state of
Idaho, or by the director of any facility in which such person may be located.
(2) The application for emergency protective placement shall state the
name and last known address of the person; the name and address of the spouse,
guardian, next of kin, or friend of the person; whether the person can be
cared for privately in the event a hold is not ordered; whether the person is,
at the time of the application, a voluntary patient; whether the person has
applied for release; and a simple and precise statement of the facts show-
ing that the person is likely to have a neurocognitive disorder and is either
likely to injure themselves or others.
(3) Any such application for emergency protective placement shall be
accompanied by a certificate of a health care provider practicing in such
hospital stating that a health care provider practicing in such hospital has
personally examined the person within the last fourteen (14) days and is of
the opinion that the person has a neurocognitive disorder and is likely to
injure themselves or others and lacks capacity to make informed decisions
about treatment or by a written statement by the applicant that the person
has refused to submit to examination by a health care provider practicing in
such hospital.
(4) Upon receipt of an application for emergency protective placement,
the court shall, within forty-eight (48) hours, order another health care
provider practicing in such hospital to make a personal examination of the
person, or if the person has not been examined, the court shall appoint two
(2) health care providers practicing in such hospital to make individual
personal examinations of the person and may order the person to submit to an
immediate examination. If neither is a physician, the court shall order a
physical examination of the person. The health care provider practicing in
such hospital shall report to the court findings within the following sev-
enty-two (72) hours as to the medical condition of the person and the need
for custody, care, or treatment by a hospital. The reports shall be in the
form of written certificates that shall be filed with the court. The court
may terminate the proceedings and dismiss the application without taking any
further action in the event the reports are to the effect that the person is
not likely to injure themselves or others due to a neurocognitive disorder.
If the proceedings are terminated, the person shall be released immediately.
(5) If the health care provider practicing in such hospital certifies a
belief that the person is likely to injure themselves or others due to a neu-
rocognitive disorder, the judge shall issue an order authorizing any health
officer, peace officer, or director of a facility to take the person to a hos-
pital in the community in which the person is residing or to the nearest hos-
pital to await the hearing, and for good cause, may authorize treatment dur-
ing such period. Under no circumstances shall the person be detained in a
nonmedical unit used for the detention of individuals charged with or con-
victed of penal offenses.
(6) Upon receipt of such application for emergency protective place-
ment by the health care provider practicing in such hospital, the court
shall appoint a time and place for a hearing not more than seven (7) days from


the receipt of such certificates and thereupon give written notice of such
time and place of such hearing, together with a copy of the application, the
health care provider's certificates, and notice of the person's right to be
represented by an attorney or, if indigent, to be represented by a court-ap-
pointed attorney to the applicant, and to the person and the person's spouse,
guardian, next of kin, or friend. With the consent of the person and the
person's attorney, the hearing may be held immediately. Upon motion of the
petitioner, or upon motion of the person and the person's attorney, and for
good cause shown, the court may continue the hearing up to an additional
seven (7) days during which time, for good cause shown, the court may autho-
rize treatment.
(7) An opportunity to be represented by counsel shall be afforded to ev-
ery person and, if neither the person nor others provide counsel, the court
shall appoint counsel in accordance with chapter 8, title 19, Idaho Code, no
later than the time the application for emergency protective placement is
received by the court.
(8) If the protective placement is commenced under this section, the
hearing shall be held in a manner and at a suitable place not likely to have
a harmful effect on the person's physical or mental health. Venue for the
hearing shall be in the county of residence of the person or in the county
where the person was found immediately prior to commencement of such pro-
ceedings.
(9) In all proceedings under this section, any existing provision of
the law prohibiting the disclosure of confidential communications between
the person and the health care provider practicing in such hospital shall not
apply and any health care provider practicing in such hospital who shall have
examined the person shall be a competent witness to testify as to the per-
son's condition.
(10) The person, the applicant, and any other persons to whom notice is
required to be given shall be afforded an opportunity to appear at the hear-
ing to testify and to present and cross-examine witnesses. The person may,
after consulting with the person's attorney, request to waive the person's
presence at court. The court may waive the presence of the person if the men-
tal or physical state of the person is such that the person's presence at the
hearing would be detrimental to the person's health or would unduly disrupt
the proceedings. A record of the proceedings shall be made as for other civil
hearings. The hearing shall be conducted in as informal a manner as may be
consistent with orderly procedure. The court shall receive all relevant and
material evidence consistent with the rules of evidence.
(11) If, upon completion of the hearing and consideration of the record,
and after consideration of reasonable alternatives, the court finds by clear
and convincing evidence that the person likely has a neurocognitive disorder
and is likely to injure themselves or others, the court shall order the per-
son to be placed under protective custody of a suitable medical hospital for
observation, care, and treatment for an indeterminate period of time not to
exceed seven (7) days.
(12) The order of protective placement shall state whether the person
lacks capacity to make informed decisions about treatment and the name and
address of the person's attorney, spouse, guardian, adult next of kin, or
friend.


(13) If the person has no spouse or guardian and if the person has prop-
erty that may not be cared for by the person while confined at a hospital,
the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the purpose of preserving the
person's estate, pending further guardianship or conservatorship proceed-
ings.
56-1906 56-2106. DUTY TO REPORT INSTANCES OF EMERGENCY PROTECTIVE
PLACEMENT. (1) Hospitals shall report all placements in which persons are
placed in emergency protective placement pursuant to section 56-1904 or
56-1905 56-2104 or 56-2105, Idaho Code, or an involuntary hold pursuant
to section 66-326 or 66-329, Idaho Code, but determined by a health care
provider to likely have a neurocognitive disorder and not mental illness to
the department every quarter. Reports shall be due to the department on the
last day of the month immediately following the end of the quarter, with the
first report due April 30, 2025.
(2) Any and all patient information submitted as a part of a report re-
quired under this section shall be protected and de-identified according to
state and federal privacy laws.
(3) The hospital shall report:
(a) The number of emergency protective placements that were placed at a
hospital by a health care provider;
(b) The number of emergency protective placements that were placed at a
hospital by a peace officer;
(c) The number of emergency protective placements that were made for
persons determined to have an underlying medical reason for placement
in the hospital who also had a neurocognitive disorder;
(d) The number of emergency protective placements that were made for
persons who did not have a neurocognitive disorder;
(e) For emergency protective placements made for persons who did not
have a medical reason for placement in the hospital other than a neu-
rocognitive disorder, how many had a length of stay after the emergency
protective placement ended at the hospital that was:
(i) Between zero (0) and five (5) days;
(ii) Between six (6) and ten (10) days;
(iii) Between eleven (11) and thirty (30) days;
(iv) Between thirty-one (31) and sixty (60) days;
(v) Between sixty-one (61) and ninety (90) days; and
(vi) More than ninety (90) days; and
(f) For emergency protective placements made for persons who had a med-
ical reason for placement in the hospital other than a neurocognitive
disorder, how many had a length of stay after the emergency protective
placement ended at the hospital that was:
(i) Between zero (0) and five (5) days;
(ii) Between six (6) and ten (10) days;
(iii) Between eleven (11) and thirty (30) days;
(iv) Between thirty-one (31) and sixty (60) days;
(v) Between sixty-one (61) and ninety (90) days; and
(vi) More than ninety (90) days.


(4) The department shall include a summary of all reports made pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section in the annual report on Alzheimer's disease
and related dementias as required in section 39-2701, Idaho Code.
56-1907 56-2107. RESPONSIBILITY FOR COSTS OF PROTECTIVE CUSTODY AND
CARE OF PATIENTS. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Protective custody period" means a period that begins when a
person is taken into custody pursuant to sections 56-1904 and 56-1905
56-2104 and 56-2105, Idaho Code, and ends when the patient is released
from protective custody.
(b) "Routine medical care" includes care provided during the protec-
tive custody period that includes hospital costs, including routine
board, room, and support services.
(c) "Third-party applicant" means a person other than a patient who
completes, signs, and files an application for medicaid on behalf of the
patient. A third-party applicant may be an adult who is a member of the
patient's family or household, the patient's authorized representa-
tive, or, if the patient is incapacitated, someone, including an agent
of a facility, who is acting responsibly for the patient.
(2) In instances where the person placed in protective custody is re-
leased with no underlying medical conditions in addition to the person's
neurocognitive disorder having been identified, costs associated with the
protective custody shall be the responsibility of the person placed in
protective custody, subject to the department of health and welfare's deter-
mination of the person's ability to pay all or any part of such costs. The
department shall:
(a) Use the state-approved fee determination form and sliding fee
schedule described in rules promulgated by the department to determine
the person's ability to pay;
(b) Inquire to determine if the person has insurance, including medical
assistance provided under the state plan for medicaid as authorized by
title XIX of the social security act, as amended; and
(c) Report its findings to the court.
(3) The court may order a person to pay costs consistent with this sec-
tion.
(4) To the extent possible, the costs of routine medical care incurred
during protective custody shall be assigned to a person's health insurance,
including medical assistance provided under the state plan for medicaid as
authorized by title XIX of the social security act, as amended. If a person
may be eligible for medicaid but has not applied, a third-party applicant,
including an agent at a hospital where a person is taken into custody or de-
tained under this chapter, may submit a medicaid application to the depart-
ment of health and welfare. The medical care provided while the person is in
protective custody shall be presumed to be medically necessary for purposes
of determining reimbursement for that care by third-party payers.
(5) Remaining costs for routine medical care shall be apportioned as
follows:
(a) The department of health and welfare shall pay providers at the rate
established by medicaid or its managed care organization. If, based on
the department of health and welfare's determination under subsection


(2) of this section, the person is able to pay a portion of the medical
costs, the person shall reimburse the department consistent with the
department's sliding fee schedule; or
(b) Costs for routine medical care during the protective placement pe-
riod shall be paid by the department of health and welfare, consistent
with the process described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
SECTION 30. That Section 66-906, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
66-906. SUCCESSION TO PROPERTY OF DECEASED RESIDENT. Hereafter, the
application of any person for membership in a veterans home of this state and
the admission of the applicant thereunder shall be and constitute a valid
and binding contract between such applicant and the administrator of the
division of veterans services in the department of self-governing agencies
of the state of Idaho. Each applicant must agree prior to admission to any
veterans home that on the death of said applicant, while a member of such
home and leaving no heirs at law next of kin, all intangible property owned
by said applicant at the time of his death, including money or choses in
action held by him and not disposed of by will, whether such property be the
proceeds of pensions or otherwise derived, shall vest in and be delivered
to the unclaimed property division within the office of the state treasurer
within one (1) year after the member's death pursuant to section 14-513
14-5-201(1)(i), Idaho Code. The applicant's property may be reclaimed by
any legatee or person entitled to take the same by inheritance at any time
within five (5) years after the death of such member, unless the member di-
rects in writing that such property be donated to the division of veterans
services after the member's death. A certificate of death for the resident
is required for the division of veterans services to accept the donation.
Any tangible property unclaimed within thirty (30) days of the death or dis-
charge of said applicant is exempt from the unclaimed property act, chapter
5, title 14, Idaho Code, and shall be assigned to the state veterans home.
The administrator of the division of veterans services is directed to so
change the form of application for membership as to give reasonable notice of
this provision to each applicant and as to contain the consent of the appli-
cant to accept membership upon the conditions herein provided.
SECTION 31. That Section 67-2360, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section 1,
Chapter 37, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:
67-2360 67-2361. CASH PAYMENT -- STATE AGENCIES. (1) Any official, de-
partment, board, commission, or agency of the state of Idaho that accepts
payment for transactions shall accept cash as a method of payment along with
any other methods of payment the official, department, board, commission, or
agency may accept.
(2) No official, department, board, commission, or agency of the state
of Idaho may charge any additional fee for cash payment.
SECTION 32. That Section 67-2601, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


67-2601. DEPARTMENT CREATED -- ORGANIZATION. (1) There is hereby cre-
ated the department of self-governing agencies. The department shall, for
the purposes of section 20, article IV of the constitution of the state of
Idaho, be an executive department of the state government.
(2) The department shall consist of the following:
(a) Agricultural commodity commissions: Idaho apple commission, as
provided by chapter 36, title 22, Idaho Code; Idaho bean commission,
as provided by chapter 29, title 22, Idaho Code; Idaho beef council, as
provided by chapter 29, title 25, Idaho Code; Idaho cherry commission,
as provided by chapter 37, title 22, Idaho Code; Idaho dairy products
commission, as provided by chapter 31, title 25, Idaho Code; Idaho pea
and lentil commission, as provided by chapter 35, title 22, Idaho Code;
Idaho potato commission, as provided by chapter 12, title 22, Idaho
Code; Idaho wheat commission, as provided by chapter 33, title 22, Idaho
Code; and Idaho alfalfa and clover seed commission, as provided in chap-
ter 42, title 22, Idaho Code.
(b) The board of commissioners of the Idaho state bar, as provided by
chapter 4, title 3, Idaho Code.
(c) The board of examiners, pursuant to section 67-2001, Idaho Code.
(d) The division of veterans services, to be headed by a division ad-
ministrator who shall be a nonclassified employee exempt from the pro-
visions of chapter 53, title 67, Idaho Code. The administrator of the
division shall administer the provisions of chapter 2, title 65, Idaho
Code, and chapter 9, title 66, Idaho Code, with the advice of the vet-
erans affairs commission established under chapter 2, title 65, Idaho
Code, and shall perform such additional duties as are imposed upon him
by law.
(e) The board of library commissioners, pursuant to section 33-2502,
Idaho Code.
(f) The Idaho state historical society, pursuant to section 67-4123,
Idaho Code.
(g) The office of the state appellate public defender, pursuant to
chapter 59, title 19, Idaho Code, and the office of the state public
defender, pursuant to chapter 60, title 19, Idaho Code.
(h) The division of occupational and professional licenses, which is
hereby created.
(i) The office of administrative hearings, pursuant to section
67-5280, Idaho Code.
(j) The office of health and social services ombudsman, pursuant to
chapter 19, title 56, Idaho Code.
(j) (k) The Idaho commission of pardons and parole, pursuant to chapter
10, title 20, Idaho Code.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
governor shall have the authority to assign entities listed in subsection
(2) of this section to divisions, sections, or units in such a manner as will
tend to provide an orderly arrangement in the administrative organization of
state government.
SECTION 33. That Section 67-2614, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


67-2614. RENEWAL OR REINSTATEMENT OF LICENSES. (1) Licenses or regis-
trations issued by the division of occupational and professional licenses as
a prerequisite to engaging in a trade, occupation, or profession may be sub-
ject to biennial renewal and may expire and be canceled unless renewed prior
to expiration as provided by this section, unless a longer time period is
otherwise specified in law or rule. The required fees for renewals and re-
instatements shall be the amounts set forth in the laws or rules of the rele-
vant agency within the division. As used in this section, the term "person,"
unless otherwise indicated, shall mean a natural person or an entity apply-
ing for licensure or registration pursuant to the laws or rules of an agency
within the division.
(2) All natural persons required to procure a license, registration,
or certificate must renew on or before the birthday of the licensee, regis-
trant, or certificate holder in the manner prescribed in subsection (6) of
this section. The first renewal of the license, registration, or certifi-
cate shall not be required until at least twelve (12) months after the li-
censee's, registrant's, or certificate holder's birthday following the ini-
tial licensure or registration.
(3) All persons required to procure a license, registration, or cer-
tificate for an entity or a facility as a prerequisite for operating a
business or place of business in which a trade, occupation, or profession is
practiced must renew the same on or before the anniversary of the original
issue date of the license, registration, or certificate in the manner pre-
scribed in subsection (6) of this section. The first renewal of the license,
registration, or certificate shall not be required until twelve (12) months
after the last day of the licensee's, registrant's, or certificate holder's
anniversary date following the initial licensure, registration, or certi-
fication.
(4) A renewal period may be extended or shortened by as much as one (1)
year to maintain established renewal cycles or to change an established re-
newal cycle.
(5) A licensee license, registration, or certificate automatically ex-
pires upon the death of a licensee, registrant, or certificate holder who is
a natural person or upon the dissolution of a licensee, registrant, or cer-
tificate holder that is a business entity.
(6) Licenses or registrations may be renewed up to six (6) weeks prior
to the expiration date.
(a) Submission of an approved and completed paper or electronic renewal
application prior to expiration is the responsibility of each licensee
or registrant. Failure to receive a renewal application or notice shall
not excuse failure to comply with renewal requirements.
(b) The renewal application shall be submitted to the division along
with the required renewal fee and confirmation of compliance with re-
newal requirements of the relevant agency within the division, includ-
ing but not limited to insurance, completion of any continuing educa-
tion, and payment of all fines, costs, fees including attorney's fees,
or other amounts that are due and owing or in compliance with a payment
arrangement.
(7) Applicants, licensees, permittees, and registrants are responsi-
ble for keeping their information up to date as follows:


(a) Whenever a change of the applicant's, licensee's, or registrant's
name or address of record occurs, the licensee or registrant must imme-
diately notify the division in writing of the change. The division will
use the most recent mailing or electronic mail address it has on file for
purposes of written communication with a licensee or registrant. It is
the responsibility of each applicant, licensee, and registrant to keep
the division informed of a current mailing and electronic mail address
and any other contact information; and
(b) Unless otherwise specified by law or rule, all substantive changes
in professional status must be reported to the division in writing
within ninety (90) days. Substantive changes may include but are not
limited to:
(i) Any criminal convictions of felonies or misdemeanors other
than traffic violations;
(ii) Administrative adjudicative proceedings against the appli-
cant, licensee, or registrant in other states or jurisdictions;
(iii) Adjudicated ethics violations or other sanctions levied
against the applicant, licensee, or registrant by a professional
association or specialty association; and
(iv) Any civil proceedings adjudicated against the applicant,
licensee, or registrant related to his license, registration, or
certificate.
(8) Fees for renewal and reinstatement cannot be waived, prorated,
transferred, or refunded unless otherwise specified in law or rule.
(9) If a license, registration, certificate, or authority is not re-
newed on or before the expiration date, it shall be immediately canceled by
the division following the date of expiration, unless otherwise specified in
law or rule. Within five (5) years of the date of expiration, the division
may reinstate a license or registration canceled for failure to renew upon
receiving documentation of compliance with requirements for timely renewal
as set forth in subsection (6)(b) of this section and any other reinstatement
requirements of the division. The division may also require payment of a re-
instatement fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) or other amount as specified
in law or rule.
(10)(a) When a license, registration, certificate, or authority has
been canceled for a period of more than five (5) years, the person so
affected shall be required to make application for a new license, reg-
istration, certificate, or authority to the division. The application
shall consist of the following:
(i) All forms and information required of an application for a new
license, registration, certificate, or authority; and
(ii) The fee currently required of an applicant for a new license,
registration, certificate, or authority.
(b) In addition to the application, the person shall provide all moneys
due and owing to the division or proof that the person is in compliance
with a payment arrangement.
(c) The person shall fulfill certain requirements as determined by the
division that demonstrate the person's competency to resume practice in
this state. Such requirements may include but are not limited to educa-
tion, supervised practice, and examination. The division may consider


the person's practice in another jurisdiction in determining the per-
son's competency.
(d) Persons who fulfill the conditions and requirements of this subsec-
tion shall be issued a new license, registration, certificate, or au-
thority.
SECTION 34. That Section 67-2921, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-2921. TRANSPORTATION OF INDUSTRIAL HEMP. (1) As used in this sec-
tion:
(a) "2014 farm bill" means the agriculture act of 2014, P.L. 113-79.
(b) "2018 farm bill" means the agriculture improvement act of 2018,
P.L. 115-334.
(c) "Hemp" or "industrial hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and
any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives,
extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers,
whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentra-
tion of not more than three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) on a dry weight
basis, as defined in the 2018 farm bill.
(d) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as provided in section
19-5101, Idaho Code.
(e) "Transporter" means any person, individual, partnership, corpora-
tion, association, grower, farmer, producer, or any other entity en-
gaged in hauling, transporting, delivering, or otherwise moving hemp in
interstate or intrastate commerce.
(f) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as provided in section 49-123, Idaho
Code.
(2) Any rule formulated and recommended by the Idaho state police or
the Idaho state department of agriculture regarding the interstate or in-
trastate transportation of hemp by a transporter or vehicle hauling indus-
trial hemp that is broader in scope or more stringent than federal law or reg-
ulations as outlined in the 2014 farm bill and the 2018 farm bill or that pro-
poses to regulate an activity not regulated by the federal government is sub-
ject to the following additional requirements: the notice of proposed rule-
making and rulemaking record requirements under chapter 52, title 67, Idaho
Code, must clearly specify that the proposed rule, or portions of the pro-
posed rule, are broader in scope or more stringent than federal law or regu-
lations or regulate an activity not regulated by the federal government and
delineate which portions of the proposed rule are broader in scope or more
stringent than federal law or regulations or regulate an activity not regu-
lated by the federal government. Such rules must be promulgated and adopted
through the negotiated rulemaking process.
(3) When a transporter or vehicle hauling industrial hemp pursuant to a
license under the provisions of the 2014 farm bill, the 2018 farm bill, or 7
CFR 990.1 et seq., is lawfully detained by a peace officer, the transporter
of industrial hemp must consent to inspection of the shipment for the purpose
of ensuring compliance with the 2014 farm bill, the 2018 farm bill, and 7 CFR
990.1 et seq. The peace officer may randomly select reasonably sized samples
not to exceed twenty (20) grams per sampling event for each unique lot, pack-
age, or identified quantity and retain them for future off-sight off-site


testing. Transporters are not entitled to compensation for these de minimis
samples. The length of the detention must be only as long as reasonably nec-
essary to effectuate inspection, sampling, and weighing of industrial hemp.
(4) Industrial hemp samples are subject to analysis in a manner consis-
tent with the 2018 farm bill and 7 CFR 990.1 et seq. to determine the total
delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration, including all tetrahy-
drocannabinolic acid (THCA). Industrial hemp samples not in compliance with
the 2018 farm bill and 7 CFR 990.1 et seq. may subject the transporter to
criminal penalties for marijuana under chapter 27, title 37, Idaho Code.
(5) Violations. It is unlawful for any person to knowingly possess in-
dustrial hemp without a license or in violation of any of the provisions of
the 2014 farm bill, the 2018 farm bill, or 7 CFR 990.1 et seq., except when
lawfully engaged in transporting industrial hemp on behalf of and at the di-
rection of the licensee.
(6) Penalties.
(a) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of
subsection (5) of this section for the first time is guilty of a misde-
meanor and is subject to a fine of no more than one hundred fifty dollars
($150).
(b) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation
of subsection (5) of this section for the second time within a period of
five (5) years of the first conviction is guilty of a misdemeanor and is
subject to a fine of no more than three hundred dollars ($300).
(c) Any person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of
subsection (5) of this section for the third or subsequent time within
a period of five (5) years of the first conviction is guilty of a mis-
demeanor, punishable by a fine of no more than one thousand dollars
($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6)
months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
(d) Industrial hemp transported or possessed in violation of subsec-
tion (5) of this section is deemed contraband and is subject to seizure
and destruction.
(7) When a substance transported and tested pursuant to this section
fails to meet the definition of industrial hemp set forth in this sec-
tion because the test results demonstrate that the substance has a delta-9
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration greater than three-tenths of one per-
cent (0.3%) on a dry weight basis, nothing in this section otherwise inhibits
or restricts any peace officer from enforcing the provisions of chapter 27,
title 37, Idaho Code.
(8) The provisions of this section must not be construed to apply to any
material or product derived from industrial hemp that contains no quantity
of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration and is not derived from the
prohibited parts of the marijuana plant, as provided in section 37-2701(t)
37-2701(u), Idaho Code.
(9) This section must not be interpreted to apply to industrial hemp
transported in or through the state of Idaho prior to enactment of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 35. That Section 67-5909B, Idaho Code, as enacted by Section 1,
Chapter 112, Laws of 2024, be, and the same is hereby amended to read as fol-
lows:


67-5909B 67-5909C. PUBLIC POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION -- DIVERSITY
STATEMENTS. (1) Hiring and admissions decisions at any public postsecondary
educational institution in the state of Idaho shall be made on merit. Hir-
ing and admissions decisions shall not be conditioned on a requirement that
applicants submit or ascribe to a diversity statement. No public post-
secondary educational institution in the state of Idaho shall require or
solicit a diversity statement as part of an admissions process, employment
application process, hiring process, contract renewal process, or promotion
process or as a condition of participation in any administrative or deci-
sion-making function of the institution.
(2) "Diversity statement" means any written or oral statement dis-
cussing:
(a) The applicant's or candidate's race, sex, color, ethnicity, or sex-
ual orientation;
(b) The applicant's or candidate's views on, experience with, or con-
tributions to diversity, equity, and inclusion; social justice; con-
fessing one's race-based privilege; confessing one's sex-based privi-
lege; partisan politics; or religion;
(c) The applicant's or candidate's views on or experience with the
race, sex, color, ethnicity, or sexual orientation of students and
coworkers; or
(d) The applicant's or candidate's views regarding any theory that
advocates for the differential treatment of any individual or groups
of individuals based on race, sex, color, gender, ethnicity, or sexual
orientation.
(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Prevent an institution requiring applicants and candidates:
(i) To disclose or discuss the content of their scholarly re-
search or creative works;
(ii) To certify compliance with state and federal anti-discrimi-
nation law; or
(iii) To discuss pedagogical approaches; or experience with stu-
dents with mental or physical disabilities; or
(b) Prevent an applicant or candidate from providing, of the appli-
cant's or candidate's own initiative, any information described in this
section.
SECTION 36. That Section 72-451, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-451. PSYCHOLOGICAL ACCIDENTS AND INJURIES. (1) Psychological in-
juries, disorders or conditions shall not be compensated under this title,
unless the following conditions are met:
(a) Such injuries of any kind or nature emanating from the workplace
shall be compensated only if caused by accident and physical injury
as defined in section 72-102(17)(a) through (17)(c), Idaho Code, or
only if accompanying an occupational disease with resultant physical
injury, except that a psychological mishap or event may constitute an
accident where:
(i) It results in resultant physical injury as long as the psycho-
logical mishap or event meets the other criteria of this section;


(ii) It is readily recognized and identifiable as having occurred
in the workplace; and
(iii) It must be the product of a sudden and extraordinary event;
(b) No compensation shall be paid for such injuries arising from con-
ditions generally inherent in every working situation or from a person-
nel-related action including, but not limited to, disciplinary action,
changes in duty, job evaluation or employment termination;
(c) Such accident and injury must be the predominant cause as compared
to all other causes combined of any consequence for which benefits are
claimed under this section;
(d) Where psychological causes or injuries are recognized by this sec-
tion, such causes or injuries must exist in a real and objective sense;
(e) Any permanent impairment or permanent disability for psychologi-
cal injury recognizable under the Idaho worker's compensation law must
be based on a condition sufficient to constitute a diagnosis using the
terminology and criteria of the American psychiatric association's di-
agnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, third edition re-
vised, or any successor manual promulgated by the American psychiatric
association, and must be made by a psychologist or psychiatrist duly li-
censed to practice in the jurisdiction in which treatment is rendered;
and
(f) Clear and convincing evidence that the psychological injuries
arose out of and in the course of the employment from an accident or oc-
cupational disease as contemplated in this section is required.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed as
allowing compensation for psychological injuries from psychological causes
without accompanying physical injury.
(3) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to ac-
cidents and injuries occurring on or after July 1, 1994, and to causes of ac-
tion for benefits accruing on or after July 1, 1994, notwithstanding that
the original worker's compensation claim may have occurred prior to July 1,
1994.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, post-traumatic
stress injury suffered by a first responder is a compensable injury or occu-
pational disease when the following conditions are met:
(a) The first responder is examined and subsequently diagnosed with
post-traumatic stress injury by a psychologist, a psychiatrist duly li-
censed to practice in the jurisdiction where treatment is rendered, or a
counselor trained in post-traumatic stress injury; and
(b) Clear and convincing evidence indicates that the post-traumatic
stress injury was caused by an event or events arising out of and in the
course of the first responder's employment.
(5) No compensation shall be paid for such injuries described in sub-
section (2) (4) of this section arising from a personnel-related action in-
cluding, but not limited to, disciplinary action, changes in duty, job eval-
uation, or employment termination.
(6) As used in subsection (4) of this section:
(a) "Post-traumatic stress injury" means a disorder that meets the di-
agnostic criteria for post-traumatic stress disorder or post-traumatic
stress injury specified by the American psychiatric association's di-


agnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders, fifth edition re-
vised, or any successor manual promulgated by the American psychiatric
association.
(b) "First responder" means:
(i) A peace officer as defined in section 19-5101(d), Idaho Code,
when employed by a city, county, or the Idaho state police;
(ii) A firefighter as defined in section 59-1302(16), Idaho Code;
(iii) A volunteer emergency responder as defined in section
72-102(31), Idaho Code;
(iv) An emergency medical service provider, or EMS provider,
certified by the department of health and welfare pursuant to
sections 56-1011 through 56-1018B, Idaho Code, and an ambu-
lance-based clinician as defined in the rules governing emergency
medical services as adopted by the department of health and wel-
fare; and
(v) An emergency communications officer as defined in section
19-5101(f), Idaho Code.
(7) Subsections (4) through (6) of this section are effective for first
responders with dates of injury or manifestations of occupational disease on
or after July 1, 2019.
SECTION 37. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.